Illinois, session 104th, SB1633.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Use Tax Act is amended by changing Section 53-5 as follows: 6    (35 ILCS 105/3-5)7    Sec. 3-5. Exemptions. Use, which, on and after January 1, 82025, includes use by a lessee, of the following tangible 9personal property is exempt from the tax imposed by this Act:10    (1) Personal property purchased from a corporation, 11society, association, foundation, institution, or 12organization, other than a limited liability company, that is 13organized and operated as a not-for-profit service enterprise 14for the benefit of persons 65 years of age or older if the 15personal property was not purchased by the enterprise for the 16purpose of resale by the enterprise.17    (2) Personal property purchased by a not-for-profit 18Illinois county fair association for use in conducting, 19operating, or promoting the county fair.20    (3) Personal property purchased by a not-for-profit arts 21or cultural organization that establishes, by proof required 22by the Department by rule, that it has received an exemption 23under Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code and that   SB1633- 2 -LRB104 08081 HLH 18127 b1is organized and operated primarily for the presentation or 2support of arts or cultural programming, activities, or 3services. These organizations include, but are not limited to, 4music and dramatic arts organizations such as symphony 5orchestras and theatrical groups, arts and cultural service 6organizations, local arts councils, visual arts organizations, 7and media arts organizations. On and after July 1, 2001 (the 8effective date of Public Act 92-35), however, an entity 9otherwise eligible for this exemption shall not make tax-free 10purchases unless it has an active identification number issued 11by the Department.12    (4) Except as otherwise provided in this Act, personal 13property purchased by a governmental body, by a corporation, 14society, association, foundation, or institution organized and 15operated exclusively for charitable, religious, or educational 16purposes, or by a not-for-profit corporation, society, 17association, foundation, institution, or organization that has 18no compensated officers or employees and that is organized and 19operated primarily for the recreation of persons 55 years of 20age or older. A limited liability company may qualify for the 21exemption under this paragraph only if the limited liability 22company is organized and operated exclusively for educational 23purposes. On and after July 1, 1987, however, no entity 24otherwise eligible for this exemption shall make tax-free 25purchases unless it has an active exemption identification 26number issued by the Department.  SB1633- 3 -LRB104 08081 HLH 18127 b1    (5) Until July 1, 2003, a passenger car that is a 2replacement vehicle to the extent that the purchase price of 3the car is subject to the Replacement Vehicle Tax.4    (6) Until July 1, 2003 and beginning again on September 1, 52004 through August 30, 2014, graphic arts machinery and 6equipment, including repair and replacement parts, both new 7and used, and including that manufactured on special order, 8certified by the purchaser to be used primarily for graphic 9arts production, and including machinery and equipment 10purchased for lease. Equipment includes chemicals or chemicals 11acting as catalysts but only if the chemicals or chemicals 12acting as catalysts effect a direct and immediate change upon 13a graphic arts product. Beginning on July 1, 2017, graphic 14arts machinery and equipment is included in the manufacturing 15and assembling machinery and equipment exemption under 16paragraph (18). 17    (7) Farm chemicals.18    (8) Legal tender, currency, medallions, or gold or silver 19coinage issued by the State of Illinois, the government of the 20United States of America, or the government of any foreign 21country, and bullion.22    (9) Personal property purchased from a teacher-sponsored 23student organization affiliated with an elementary or 24secondary school located in Illinois.25    (10) A motor vehicle that is used for automobile renting, 26as defined in the Automobile Renting Occupation and Use Tax   SB1633- 4 -LRB104 08081 HLH 18127 b1Act.2    (11) Farm machinery and equipment, both new and used, 3including that manufactured on special order, certified by the 4purchaser to be used primarily for production agriculture or 5State or federal agricultural programs, including individual 6replacement parts for the machinery and equipment, including 7machinery and equipment purchased for lease, and including 8implements of husbandry defined in Section 1-130 of the 9Illinois Vehicle Code, farm machinery and agricultural 10chemical and fertilizer spreaders, and nurse wagons required 11to be registered under Section 3-809 of the Illinois Vehicle 12Code, but excluding other motor vehicles required to be 13registered under the Illinois Vehicle Code. Horticultural 14polyhouses or hoop houses used for propagating, growing, or 15overwintering plants shall be considered farm machinery and 16equipment under this item (11). Agricultural chemical tender 17tanks and dry boxes shall include units sold separately from a 18motor vehicle required to be licensed and units sold mounted 19on a motor vehicle required to be licensed if the selling price 20of the tender is separately stated.21    Farm machinery and equipment shall include precision 22farming equipment that is installed or purchased to be 23installed on farm machinery and equipment, including, but not 24limited to, tractors, harvesters, sprayers, planters, seeders, 25or spreaders. Precision farming equipment includes, but is not 26limited to, soil testing sensors, computers, monitors,   SB1633- 5 -LRB104 08081 HLH 18127 b1software, global positioning and mapping systems, and other 2such equipment.3    Farm machinery and equipment also includes computers, 4sensors, software, and related equipment used primarily in the 5computer-assisted operation of production agriculture 6facilities, equipment, and activities such as, but not limited 7to, the collection, monitoring, and correlation of animal and 8crop data for the purpose of formulating animal diets and 9agricultural chemicals. 10    Beginning on January 1, 2024, farm machinery and equipment 11also includes electrical power generation equipment used 12primarily for production agriculture. 13    This item (11) is exempt from the provisions of Section 143-90.15    (12) Until June 30, 2013, fuel and petroleum products sold 16to or used by an air common carrier, certified by the carrier 17to be used for consumption, shipment, or storage in the 18conduct of its business as an air common carrier, for a flight 19destined for or returning from a location or locations outside 20the United States without regard to previous or subsequent 21domestic stopovers.22    Beginning July 1, 2013, fuel and petroleum products sold 23to or used by an air carrier, certified by the carrier to be 24used for consumption, shipment, or storage in the conduct of 25its business as an air common carrier, for a flight that (i) is 26engaged in foreign trade or is engaged in trade between the   SB1633- 6 -LRB104 08081 HLH 18127 b1United States and any of its possessions and (ii) transports 2at least one individual or package for hire from the city of 3origination to the city of final destination on the same 4aircraft, without regard to a change in the flight number of 5that aircraft. 6    (13) Proceeds of mandatory service charges separately 7stated on customers' bills for the purchase and consumption of 8food and beverages purchased at retail from a retailer, to the 9extent that the proceeds of the service charge are in fact 10turned over as tips or as a substitute for tips to the 11employees who participate directly in preparing, serving, 12hosting or cleaning up the food or beverage function with 13respect to which the service charge is imposed.14    (14) Until July 1, 2003, oil field exploration, drilling, 15and production equipment, including (i) rigs and parts of 16rigs, rotary rigs, cable tool rigs, and workover rigs, (ii) 17pipe and tubular goods, including casing and drill strings, 18(iii) pumps and pump-jack units, (iv) storage tanks and flow 19lines, (v) any individual replacement part for oil field 20exploration, drilling, and production equipment, and (vi) 21machinery and equipment purchased for lease; but excluding 22motor vehicles required to be registered under the Illinois 23Vehicle Code.24    (15) Photoprocessing machinery and equipment, including 25repair and replacement parts, both new and used, including 26that manufactured on special order, certified by the purchaser   SB1633- 7 -LRB104 08081 HLH 18127 b1to be used primarily for photoprocessing, and including 2photoprocessing machinery and equipment purchased for lease.3    (16) Until July 1, 2028, coal and aggregate exploration, 4mining, off-highway hauling, processing, maintenance, and 5reclamation equipment, including replacement parts and 6equipment, and including equipment purchased for lease, but 7excluding motor vehicles required to be registered under the 8Illinois Vehicle Code. The changes made to this Section by 9Public Act 97-767 apply on and after July 1, 2003, but no claim 10for credit or refund is allowed on or after August 16, 2013 11(the effective date of Public Act 98-456) for such taxes paid 12during the period beginning July 1, 2003 and ending on August 1316, 2013 (the effective date of Public Act 98-456). 14    (17) Until July 1, 2003, distillation machinery and 15equipment, sold as a unit or kit, assembled or installed by the 16retailer, certified by the user to be used only for the 17production of ethyl alcohol that will be used for consumption 18as motor fuel or as a component of motor fuel for the personal 19use of the user, and not subject to sale or resale.20    (18) Manufacturing and assembling machinery and equipment 21used primarily in the process of manufacturing or assembling 22tangible personal property for wholesale or retail sale or 23lease, whether that sale or lease is made directly by the 24manufacturer or by some other person, whether the materials 25used in the process are owned by the manufacturer or some other 26person, or whether that sale or lease is made apart from or as   SB1633- 8 -LRB104 08081 HLH 18127 b1an incident to the seller's engaging in the service occupation 2of producing machines, tools, dies, jigs, patterns, gauges, or 3other similar items of no commercial value on special order 4for a particular purchaser. The exemption provided by this 5paragraph (18) includes production related tangible personal 6property, as defined in Section 3-50, purchased on or after 7July 1, 2019. The exemption provided by this paragraph (18) 8does not include machinery and equipment used in (i) the 9generation of electricity for wholesale or retail sale; (ii) 10the generation or treatment of natural or artificial gas for 11wholesale or retail sale that is delivered to customers 12through pipes, pipelines, or mains; or (iii) the treatment of 13water for wholesale or retail sale that is delivered to 14customers through pipes, pipelines, or mains. The provisions 15of Public Act 98-583 are declaratory of existing law as to the 16meaning and scope of this exemption. Beginning on July 1, 172017, the exemption provided by this paragraph (18) includes, 18but is not limited to, graphic arts machinery and equipment, 19as defined in paragraph (6) of this Section. 20    (19) Personal property delivered to a purchaser or 21purchaser's donee inside Illinois when the purchase order for 22that personal property was received by a florist located 23outside Illinois who has a florist located inside Illinois 24deliver the personal property.25    (20) Semen used for artificial insemination of livestock 26for direct agricultural production.  SB1633- 9 -LRB104 08081 HLH 18127 b1    (21) Horses, or interests in horses, registered with and 2meeting the requirements of any of the Arabian Horse Club 3Registry of America, Appaloosa Horse Club, American Quarter 4Horse Association, United States Trotting Association, or 5Jockey Club, as appropriate, used for purposes of breeding or 6racing for prizes. This item (21) is exempt from the 7provisions of Section 3-90, and the exemption provided for 8under this item (21) applies for all periods beginning May 30, 91995, but no claim for credit or refund is allowed on or after 10January 1, 2008 for such taxes paid during the period 11beginning May 30, 2000 and ending on January 1, 2008. 12    (22) Computers and communications equipment utilized for 13any hospital purpose and equipment used in the diagnosis, 14analysis, or treatment of hospital patients purchased by a 15lessor who leases the equipment, under a lease of one year or 16longer executed or in effect at the time the lessor would 17otherwise be subject to the tax imposed by this Act, to a 18hospital that has been issued an active tax exemption 19identification number by the Department under Section 1g of 20the Retailers' Occupation Tax Act. If the equipment is leased 21in a manner that does not qualify for this exemption or is used 22in any other non-exempt manner, the lessor shall be liable for 23the tax imposed under this Act or the Service Use Tax Act, as 24the case may be, based on the fair market value of the property 25at the time the non-qualifying use occurs. No lessor shall 26collect or attempt to collect an amount (however designated)   SB1633- 10 -LRB104 08081 HLH 18127 b1that purports to reimburse that lessor for the tax imposed by 2this Act or the Service Use Tax Act, as the case may be, if the 3tax has not been paid by the lessor. If a lessor improperly 4collects any such amount from the lessee, the lessee shall 5have a legal right to claim a refund of that amount from the 6lessor. If, however, that amount is not refunded to the lessee 7for any reason, the lessor is liable to pay that amount to the 8Department.9    (23) Personal property purchased by a lessor who leases 10the property, under a lease of one year or longer executed or 11in effect at the time the lessor would otherwise be subject to 12the tax imposed by this Act, to a governmental body that has 13been issued an active sales tax exemption identification 14number by the Department under Section 1g of the Retailers' 15Occupation Tax Act. If the property is leased in a manner that 16does not qualify for this exemption or used in any other 17non-exempt manner, the lessor shall be liable for the tax 18imposed under this Act or the Service Use Tax Act, as the case 19may be, based on the fair market value of the property at the 20time the non-qualifying use occurs. No lessor shall collect or 21attempt to collect an amount (however designated) that 22purports to reimburse that lessor for the tax imposed by this 23Act or the Service Use Tax Act, as the case may be, if the tax 24has not been paid by the lessor. If a lessor improperly 25collects any such amount from the lessee, the lessee shall 26have a legal right to claim a refund of that amount from the   SB1633- 11 -LRB104 08081 HLH 18127 b1lessor. If, however, that amount is not refunded to the lessee 2for any reason, the lessor is liable to pay that amount to the 3Department.4    (24) Beginning with taxable years ending on or after 5December 31, 1995 and ending with taxable years ending on or 6before December 31, 2004, personal property that is donated 7for disaster relief to be used in a State or federally declared 8disaster area in Illinois or bordering Illinois by a 9manufacturer or retailer that is registered in this State to a 10corporation, society, association, foundation, or institution 11that has been issued a sales tax exemption identification 12number by the Department that assists victims of the disaster 13who reside within the declared disaster area.14    (25) Beginning with taxable years ending on or after 15December 31, 1995 and ending with taxable years ending on or 16before December 31, 2004, personal property that is used in 17the performance of infrastructure repairs in this State, 18including, but not limited to, municipal roads and streets, 19access roads, bridges, sidewalks, waste disposal systems, 20water and sewer line extensions, water distribution and 21purification facilities, storm water drainage and retention 22facilities, and sewage treatment facilities, resulting from a 23State or federally declared disaster in Illinois or bordering 24Illinois when such repairs are initiated on facilities located 25in the declared disaster area within 6 months after the 26disaster.  SB1633- 12 -LRB104 08081 HLH 18127 b1    (26) Beginning July 1, 1999, game or game birds purchased 2at a "game breeding and hunting preserve area" as that term is 3used in the Wildlife Code. This paragraph is exempt from the 4provisions of Section 3-90.5    (27) A motor vehicle, as that term is defined in Section 61-146 of the Illinois Vehicle Code, that is donated to a 7corporation, limited liability company, society, association, 8foundation, or institution that is determined by the 9Department to be organized and operated exclusively for 10educational purposes. For purposes of this exemption, "a 11corporation, limited liability company, society, association, 12foundation, or institution organized and operated exclusively 13for educational purposes" means all tax-supported public 14schools, private schools that offer systematic instruction in 15useful branches of learning by methods common to public 16schools and that compare favorably in their scope and 17intensity with the course of study presented in tax-supported 18schools, and vocational or technical schools or institutes 19organized and operated exclusively to provide a course of 20study of not less than 6 weeks duration and designed to prepare 21individuals to follow a trade or to pursue a manual, 22technical, mechanical, industrial, business, or commercial 23occupation.24    (28) Beginning January 1, 2000, personal property, 25including food, purchased through fundraising events for the 26benefit of a public or private elementary or secondary school,   SB1633- 13 -LRB104 08081 HLH 18127 b1a group of those schools, or one or more school districts if 2the events are sponsored by an entity recognized by the school 3district that consists primarily of volunteers and includes 4parents and teachers of the school children. This paragraph 5does not apply to fundraising events (i) for the benefit of 6private home instruction or (ii) for which the fundraising 7entity purchases the personal property sold at the events from 8another individual or entity that sold the property for the 9purpose of resale by the fundraising entity and that profits 10from the sale to the fundraising entity. This paragraph is 11exempt from the provisions of Section 3-90.12    (29) Beginning January 1, 2000 and through December 31, 132001, new or used automatic vending machines that prepare and 14serve hot food and beverages, including coffee, soup, and 15other items, and replacement parts for these machines. 16Beginning January 1, 2002 and through June 30, 2003, machines 17and parts for machines used in commercial, coin-operated 18amusement and vending business if a use or occupation tax is 19paid on the gross receipts derived from the use of the 20commercial, coin-operated amusement and vending machines. This 21paragraph is exempt from the provisions of Section 3-90.22    (30) Beginning January 1, 2001 and through June 30, 2016, 23food for human consumption that is to be consumed off the 24premises where it is sold (other than alcoholic beverages, 25soft drinks, and food that has been prepared for immediate 26consumption) and prescription and nonprescription medicines,   SB1633- 14 -LRB104 08081 HLH 18127 b1drugs, medical appliances, and insulin, urine testing 2materials, syringes, and needles used by diabetics, for human 3use, when purchased for use by a person receiving medical 4assistance under Article V of the Illinois Public Aid Code who 5resides in a licensed long-term care facility, as defined in 6the Nursing Home Care Act, or in a licensed facility as defined 7in the ID/DD Community Care Act, the MC/DD Act, or the 8Specialized Mental Health Rehabilitation Act of 2013.9    (31) Beginning on August 2, 2001 (the effective date of 10Public Act 92-227), computers and communications equipment 11utilized for any hospital purpose and equipment used in the 12diagnosis, analysis, or treatment of hospital patients 13purchased by a lessor who leases the equipment, under a lease 14of one year or longer executed or in effect at the time the 15lessor would otherwise be subject to the tax imposed by this 16Act, to a hospital that has been issued an active tax exemption 17identification number by the Department under Section 1g of 18the Retailers' Occupation Tax Act. If the equipment is leased 19in a manner that does not qualify for this exemption or is used 20in any other nonexempt manner, the lessor shall be liable for 21the tax imposed under this Act or the Service Use Tax Act, as 22the case may be, based on the fair market value of the property 23at the time the nonqualifying use occurs. No lessor shall 24collect or attempt to collect an amount (however designated) 25that purports to reimburse that lessor for the tax imposed by 26this Act or the Service Use Tax Act, as the case may be, if the   SB1633- 15 -LRB104 08081 HLH 18127 b1tax has not been paid by the lessor. If a lessor improperly 2collects any such amount from the lessee, the lessee shall 3have a legal right to claim a refund of that amount from the 4lessor. If, however, that amount is not refunded to the lessee 5for any reason, the lessor is liable to pay that amount to the 6Department. This paragraph is exempt from the provisions of 7Section 3-90.8    (32) Beginning on August 2, 2001 (the effective date of 9Public Act 92-227), personal property purchased by a lessor 10who leases the property, under a lease of one year or longer 11executed or in effect at the time the lessor would otherwise be 12subject to the tax imposed by this Act, to a governmental body 13that has been issued an active sales tax exemption 14identification number by the Department under Section 1g of 15the Retailers' Occupation Tax Act. If the property is leased 16in a manner that does not qualify for this exemption or used in 17any other nonexempt manner, the lessor shall be liable for the 18tax imposed under this Act or the Service Use Tax Act, as the 19case may be, based on the fair market value of the property at 20the time the nonqualifying use occurs. No lessor shall collect 21or attempt to collect an amount (however designated) that 22purports to reimburse that lessor for the tax imposed by this 23Act or the Service Use Tax Act, as the case may be, if the tax 24has not been paid by the lessor. If a lessor improperly 25collects any such amount from the lessee, the lessee shall 26have a legal right to claim a refund of that amount from the   SB1633- 16 -LRB104 08081 HLH 18127 b1lessor. If, however, that amount is not refunded to the lessee 2for any reason, the lessor is liable to pay that amount to the 3Department. This paragraph is exempt from the provisions of 4Section 3-90.5    (33) On and after July 1, 2003 and through June 30, 2004, 6the use in this State of motor vehicles of the second division 7with a gross vehicle weight in excess of 8,000 pounds and that 8are subject to the commercial distribution fee imposed under 9Section 3-815.1 of the Illinois Vehicle Code. Beginning on 10July 1, 2004 and through June 30, 2005, the use in this State 11of motor vehicles of the second division: (i) with a gross 12vehicle weight rating in excess of 8,000 pounds; (ii) that are 13subject to the commercial distribution fee imposed under 14Section 3-815.1 of the Illinois Vehicle Code; and (iii) that 15are primarily used for commercial purposes. Through June 30, 162005, this exemption applies to repair and replacement parts 17added after the initial purchase of such a motor vehicle if 18that motor vehicle is used in a manner that would qualify for 19the rolling stock exemption otherwise provided for in this 20Act. For purposes of this paragraph, the term "used for 21commercial purposes" means the transportation of persons or 22property in furtherance of any commercial or industrial 23enterprise, whether for-hire or not. 24    (34) Beginning January 1, 2008, tangible personal property 25used in the construction or maintenance of a community water 26supply, as defined under Section 3.145 of the Environmental   SB1633- 17 -LRB104 08081 HLH 18127 b1Protection Act, that is operated by a not-for-profit 2corporation that holds a valid water supply permit issued 3under Title IV of the Environmental Protection Act. This 4paragraph is exempt from the provisions of Section 3-90.5    (35) Beginning January 1, 2010 and continuing through 6December 31, 2029, materials, parts, equipment, components, 7and furnishings incorporated into or upon an aircraft as part 8of the modification, refurbishment, completion, replacement, 9repair, or maintenance of the aircraft. This exemption 10includes consumable supplies used in the modification, 11refurbishment, completion, replacement, repair, and 12maintenance of aircraft. However, until January 1, 2024, this 13exemption excludes any materials, parts, equipment, 14components, and consumable supplies used in the modification, 15replacement, repair, and maintenance of aircraft engines or 16power plants, whether such engines or power plants are 17installed or uninstalled upon any such aircraft. "Consumable 18supplies" include, but are not limited to, adhesive, tape, 19sandpaper, general purpose lubricants, cleaning solution, 20latex gloves, and protective films. 21    Beginning January 1, 2010 and continuing through December 2231, 2023, this exemption applies only to the use of qualifying 23tangible personal property by persons who modify, refurbish, 24complete, repair, replace, or maintain aircraft and who (i) 25hold an Air Agency Certificate and are empowered to operate an 26approved repair station by the Federal Aviation   SB1633- 18 -LRB104 08081 HLH 18127 b1Administration, (ii) have a Class IV Rating, and (iii) conduct 2operations in accordance with Part 145 of the Federal Aviation 3Regulations. From January 1, 2024 through December 31, 2029, 4this exemption applies only to the use of qualifying tangible 5personal property by: (A) persons who modify, refurbish, 6complete, repair, replace, or maintain aircraft and who (i) 7hold an Air Agency Certificate and are empowered to operate an 8approved repair station by the Federal Aviation 9Administration, (ii) have a Class IV Rating, and (iii) conduct 10operations in accordance with Part 145 of the Federal Aviation 11Regulations; and (B) persons who engage in the modification, 12replacement, repair, and maintenance of aircraft engines or 13power plants without regard to whether or not those persons 14meet the qualifications of item (A). 15    The exemption does not include aircraft operated by a 16commercial air carrier providing scheduled passenger air 17service pursuant to authority issued under Part 121 or Part 18129 of the Federal Aviation Regulations. The changes made to 19this paragraph (35) by Public Act 98-534 are declarative of 20existing law. It is the intent of the General Assembly that the 21exemption under this paragraph (35) applies continuously from 22January 1, 2010 through December 31, 2024; however, no claim 23for credit or refund is allowed for taxes paid as a result of 24the disallowance of this exemption on or after January 1, 2015 25and prior to February 5, 2020 (the effective date of Public Act 26101-629).  SB1633- 19 -LRB104 08081 HLH 18127 b1    (36) Tangible personal property purchased by a 2public-facilities corporation, as described in Section 311-65-10 of the Illinois Municipal Code, for purposes of 4constructing or furnishing a municipal convention hall, but 5only if the legal title to the municipal convention hall is 6transferred to the municipality without any further 7consideration by or on behalf of the municipality at the time 8of the completion of the municipal convention hall or upon the 9retirement or redemption of any bonds or other debt 10instruments issued by the public-facilities corporation in 11connection with the development of the municipal convention 12hall. This exemption includes existing public-facilities 13corporations as provided in Section 11-65-25 of the Illinois 14Municipal Code. This paragraph is exempt from the provisions 15of Section 3-90. 16    (37) Beginning January 1, 2017 and through December 31, 172026, menstrual pads, tampons, and menstrual cups. 18    (38) Merchandise that is subject to the Rental Purchase 19Agreement Occupation and Use Tax. The purchaser must certify 20that the item is purchased to be rented subject to a 21rental-purchase agreement, as defined in the Rental-Purchase 22Agreement Act, and provide proof of registration under the 23Rental Purchase Agreement Occupation and Use Tax Act. This 24paragraph is exempt from the provisions of Section 3-90.25    (39) Tangible personal property purchased by a purchaser 26who is exempt from the tax imposed by this Act by operation of   SB1633- 20 -LRB104 08081 HLH 18127 b1federal law. This paragraph is exempt from the provisions of 2Section 3-90.3    (40) Qualified tangible personal property used in the 4construction or operation of a data center that has been 5granted a certificate of exemption by the Department of 6Commerce and Economic Opportunity, whether that tangible 7personal property is purchased by the owner, operator, or 8tenant of the data center or by a contractor or subcontractor 9of the owner, operator, or tenant. Data centers that would 10have qualified for a certificate of exemption prior to January 111, 2020 had Public Act 101-31 been in effect may apply for and 12obtain an exemption for subsequent purchases of computer 13equipment or enabling software purchased or leased to upgrade, 14supplement, or replace computer equipment or enabling software 15purchased or leased in the original investment that would have 16qualified. 17    The Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity shall 18grant a certificate of exemption under this item (40) to 19qualified data centers as defined by Section 605-1025 of the 20Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity Law of the 21Civil Administrative Code of Illinois. 22    For the purposes of this item (40): 23        "Data center" means a building or a series of 24    buildings rehabilitated or constructed to house working 25    servers in one physical location or multiple sites within 26    the State of Illinois.   SB1633- 21 -LRB104 08081 HLH 18127 b1        "Qualified tangible personal property" means: 2    electrical systems and equipment; climate control and 3    chilling equipment and systems; mechanical systems and 4    equipment; monitoring and secure systems; emergency 5    generators; hardware; computers; servers; data storage 6    devices; network connectivity equipment; racks; cabinets; 7    telecommunications cabling infrastructure; raised floor 8    systems; peripheral components or systems; software; 9    mechanical, electrical, or plumbing systems; battery 10    systems; cooling systems and towers; temperature control 11    systems; other cabling; and other data center 12    infrastructure equipment and systems necessary to operate 13    qualified tangible personal property, including fixtures; 14    and component parts of any of the foregoing, including 15    installation, maintenance, repair, refurbishment, and 16    replacement of qualified tangible personal property to 17    generate, transform, transmit, distribute, or manage 18    electricity necessary to operate qualified tangible 19    personal property; and all other tangible personal 20    property that is essential to the operations of a computer 21    data center. The term "qualified tangible personal 22    property" also includes building materials physically 23    incorporated into the qualifying data center. To document 24    the exemption allowed under this Section, the retailer 25    must obtain from the purchaser a copy of the certificate 26    of eligibility issued by the Department of Commerce and   SB1633- 22 -LRB104 08081 HLH 18127 b1    Economic Opportunity. 2    This item (40) is exempt from the provisions of Section 33-90. 4    (41) Beginning July 1, 2022, breast pumps, breast pump 5collection and storage supplies, and breast pump kits. This 6item (41) is exempt from the provisions of Section 3-90. As 7used in this item (41): 8        "Breast pump" means an electrically controlled or 9    manually controlled pump device designed or marketed to be 10    used to express milk from a human breast during lactation, 11    including the pump device and any battery, AC adapter, or 12    other power supply unit that is used to power the pump 13    device and is packaged and sold with the pump device at the 14    time of sale. 15        "Breast pump collection and storage supplies" means 16    items of tangible personal property designed or marketed 17    to be used in conjunction with a breast pump to collect 18    milk expressed from a human breast and to store collected 19    milk until it is ready for consumption. 20        "Breast pump collection and storage supplies" 21    includes, but is not limited to: breast shields and breast 22    shield connectors; breast pump tubes and tubing adapters; 23    breast pump valves and membranes; backflow protectors and 24    backflow protector adaptors; bottles and bottle caps 25    specific to the operation of the breast pump; and breast 26    milk storage bags.   SB1633- 23 -LRB104 08081 HLH 18127 b1        "Breast pump collection and storage supplies" does not 2    include: (1) bottles and bottle caps not specific to the 3    operation of the breast pump; (2) breast pump travel bags 4    and other similar carrying accessories, including ice 5    packs, labels, and other similar products; (3) breast pump 6    cleaning supplies; (4) nursing bras, bra pads, breast 7    shells, and other similar products; and (5) creams, 8    ointments, and other similar products that relieve 9    breastfeeding-related symptoms or conditions of the 10    breasts or nipples, unless sold as part of a breast pump 11    kit that is pre-packaged by the breast pump manufacturer 12    or distributor. 13        "Breast pump kit" means a kit that: (1) contains no 14    more than a breast pump, breast pump collection and 15    storage supplies, a rechargeable battery for operating the 16    breast pump, a breastmilk cooler, bottle stands, ice 17    packs, and a breast pump carrying case; and (2) is 18    pre-packaged as a breast pump kit by the breast pump 19    manufacturer or distributor. 20    (42) Tangible personal property sold by or on behalf of 21the State Treasurer pursuant to the Revised Uniform Unclaimed 22Property Act. This item (42) is exempt from the provisions of 23Section 3-90. 24    (43) Beginning on January 1, 2024, tangible personal 25property purchased by an active duty member of the armed 26forces of the United States who presents valid military   SB1633- 24 -LRB104 08081 HLH 18127 b1identification and purchases the property using a form of 2payment where the federal government is the payor. The member 3of the armed forces must complete, at the point of sale, a form 4prescribed by the Department of Revenue documenting that the 5transaction is eligible for the exemption under this 6paragraph. Retailers must keep the form as documentation of 7the exemption in their records for a period of not less than 6 8years. "Armed forces of the United States" means the United 9States Army, Navy, Air Force, Space Force, Marine Corps, or 10Coast Guard. This paragraph is exempt from the provisions of 11Section 3-90. 12    (44) Beginning July 1, 2024, home-delivered meals provided 13to Medicare or Medicaid recipients when payment is made by an 14intermediary, such as a Medicare Administrative Contractor, a 15Managed Care Organization, or a Medicare Advantage 16Organization, pursuant to a government contract. This item 17(44) is exempt from the provisions of Section 3-90. 18    (45) (44) Beginning on January 1, 2026, as further defined 19in Section 3-10, food for human consumption that is to be 20consumed off the premises where it is sold (other than 21alcoholic beverages, food consisting of or infused with adult 22use cannabis, soft drinks, candy, and food that has been 23prepared for immediate consumption). This item (45) (44) is 24exempt from the provisions of Section 3-90. 25    (46) (44) Use by the lessee of the following leased 26tangible personal property:  SB1633- 25 -LRB104 08081 HLH 18127 b1        (1) software transferred subject to a license that 2    meets the following requirements:3            (A) it is evidenced by a written agreement signed 4        by the licensor and the customer;5                (i) an electronic agreement in which the 6            customer accepts the license by means of an 7            electronic signature that is verifiable and can be 8            authenticated and is attached to or made part of 9            the license will comply with this requirement;10                (ii) a license agreement in which the customer 11            electronically accepts the terms by clicking "I 12            agree" does not comply with this requirement;13            (B) it restricts the customer's duplication and 14        use of the software;15            (C) it prohibits the customer from licensing, 16        sublicensing, or transferring the software to a third 17        party (except to a related party) without the 18        permission and continued control of the licensor;19            (D) the licensor has a policy of providing another 20        copy at minimal or no charge if the customer loses or 21        damages the software, or of permitting the licensee to 22        make and keep an archival copy, and such policy is 23        either stated in the license agreement, supported by 24        the licensor's books and records, or supported by a 25        notarized statement made under penalties of perjury by 26        the licensor; and  SB1633- 26 -LRB104 08081 HLH 18127 b1            (E) the customer must destroy or return all copies 2        of the software to the licensor at the end of the 3        license period; this provision is deemed to be met, in 4        the case of a perpetual license, without being set 5        forth in the license agreement; and6        (2) property that is subject to a tax on lease 7    receipts imposed by a home rule unit of local government 8    if the ordinance imposing that tax was adopted prior to 9    January 1, 2023; and . 10        (3) a solar energy system, as defined in Section 10-5 11    of the Property Tax Code. 12(Source: P.A. 102-16, eff. 6-17-21; 102-700, Article 70, 13Section 70-5, eff. 4-19-22; 102-700, Article 75, Section 75-5, 14eff. 4-19-22; 102-1026, eff. 5-27-22; 103-9, Article 5, 15Section 5-5, eff. 6-7-23; 103-9, Article 15, Section 15-5, 16eff. 6-7-23; 103-154, eff. 6-30-23; 103-384, eff. 1-1-24; 17103-592, eff. 1-1-25; 103-605, eff. 7-1-24; 103-643, eff. 187-1-24; 103-746, eff. 1-1-25; 103-781, eff. 8-5-24; revised 1911-26-24.) 20    Section 10. The Service Use Tax Act is amended by changing 21Section 3-5 as follows: 22    (35 ILCS 110/3-5)23    Sec. 3-5. Exemptions. Use of the following tangible 24personal property is exempt from the tax imposed by this Act:  SB1633- 27 -LRB104 08081 HLH 18127 b1    (1) Personal property purchased from a corporation, 2society, association, foundation, institution, or 3organization, other than a limited liability company, that is 4organized and operated as a not-for-profit service enterprise 5for the benefit of persons 65 years of age or older if the 6personal property was not purchased by the enterprise for the 7purpose of resale by the enterprise.8    (2) Personal property purchased by a non-profit Illinois 9county fair association for use in conducting, operating, or 10promoting the county fair.11    (3) Personal property purchased by a not-for-profit arts 12or cultural organization that establishes, by proof required 13by the Department by rule, that it has received an exemption 14under Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code and that 15is organized and operated primarily for the presentation or 16support of arts or cultural programming, activities, or 17services. These organizations include, but are not limited to, 18music and dramatic arts organizations such as symphony 19orchestras and theatrical groups, arts and cultural service 20organizations, local arts councils, visual arts organizations, 21and media arts organizations. On and after July 1, 2001 (the 22effective date of Public Act 92-35), however, an entity 23otherwise eligible for this exemption shall not make tax-free 24purchases unless it has an active identification number issued 25by the Department.26    (4) Legal tender, currency, medallions, or gold or silver   SB1633- 28 -LRB104 08081 HLH 18127 b1coinage issued by the State of Illinois, the government of the 2United States of America, or the government of any foreign 3country, and bullion.4    (5) Until July 1, 2003 and beginning again on September 1, 52004 through August 30, 2014, graphic arts machinery and 6equipment, including repair and replacement parts, both new 7and used, and including that manufactured on special order or 8purchased for lease, certified by the purchaser to be used 9primarily for graphic arts production. Equipment includes 10chemicals or chemicals acting as catalysts but only if the 11chemicals or chemicals acting as catalysts effect a direct and 12immediate change upon a graphic arts product. Beginning on 13July 1, 2017, graphic arts machinery and equipment is included 14in the manufacturing and assembling machinery and equipment 15exemption under Section 2 of this Act.16    (6) Personal property purchased from a teacher-sponsored 17student organization affiliated with an elementary or 18secondary school located in Illinois.19    (7) Farm machinery and equipment, both new and used, 20including that manufactured on special order, certified by the 21purchaser to be used primarily for production agriculture or 22State or federal agricultural programs, including individual 23replacement parts for the machinery and equipment, including 24machinery and equipment purchased for lease, and including 25implements of husbandry defined in Section 1-130 of the 26Illinois Vehicle Code, farm machinery and agricultural   SB1633- 29 -LRB104 08081 HLH 18127 b1chemical and fertilizer spreaders, and nurse wagons required 2to be registered under Section 3-809 of the Illinois Vehicle 3Code, but excluding other motor vehicles required to be 4registered under the Illinois Vehicle Code. Horticultural 5polyhouses or hoop houses used for propagating, growing, or 6overwintering plants shall be considered farm machinery and 7equipment under this item (7). Agricultural chemical tender 8tanks and dry boxes shall include units sold separately from a 9motor vehicle required to be licensed and units sold mounted 10on a motor vehicle required to be licensed if the selling price 11of the tender is separately stated.12    Farm machinery and equipment shall include precision 13farming equipment that is installed or purchased to be 14installed on farm machinery and equipment, including, but not 15limited to, tractors, harvesters, sprayers, planters, seeders, 16or spreaders. Precision farming equipment includes, but is not 17limited to, soil testing sensors, computers, monitors, 18software, global positioning and mapping systems, and other 19such equipment.20    Farm machinery and equipment also includes computers, 21sensors, software, and related equipment used primarily in the 22computer-assisted operation of production agriculture 23facilities, equipment, and activities such as, but not limited 24to, the collection, monitoring, and correlation of animal and 25crop data for the purpose of formulating animal diets and 26agricultural chemicals.   SB1633- 30 -LRB104 08081 HLH 18127 b1    Beginning on January 1, 2024, farm machinery and equipment 2also includes electrical power generation equipment used 3primarily for production agriculture. 4    This item (7) is exempt from the provisions of Section 53-75.6    (8) Until June 30, 2013, fuel and petroleum products sold 7to or used by an air common carrier, certified by the carrier 8to be used for consumption, shipment, or storage in the 9conduct of its business as an air common carrier, for a flight 10destined for or returning from a location or locations outside 11the United States without regard to previous or subsequent 12domestic stopovers.13    Beginning July 1, 2013, fuel and petroleum products sold 14to or used by an air carrier, certified by the carrier to be 15used for consumption, shipment, or storage in the conduct of 16its business as an air common carrier, for a flight that (i) is 17engaged in foreign trade or is engaged in trade between the 18United States and any of its possessions and (ii) transports 19at least one individual or package for hire from the city of 20origination to the city of final destination on the same 21aircraft, without regard to a change in the flight number of 22that aircraft. 23    (9) Proceeds of mandatory service charges separately 24stated on customers' bills for the purchase and consumption of 25food and beverages acquired as an incident to the purchase of a 26service from a serviceman, to the extent that the proceeds of   SB1633- 31 -LRB104 08081 HLH 18127 b1the service charge are in fact turned over as tips or as a 2substitute for tips to the employees who participate directly 3in preparing, serving, hosting or cleaning up the food or 4beverage function with respect to which the service charge is 5imposed.6    (10) Until July 1, 2003, oil field exploration, drilling, 7and production equipment, including (i) rigs and parts of 8rigs, rotary rigs, cable tool rigs, and workover rigs, (ii) 9pipe and tubular goods, including casing and drill strings, 10(iii) pumps and pump-jack units, (iv) storage tanks and flow 11lines, (v) any individual replacement part for oil field 12exploration, drilling, and production equipment, and (vi) 13machinery and equipment purchased for lease; but excluding 14motor vehicles required to be registered under the Illinois 15Vehicle Code.16    (11) Proceeds from the sale of photoprocessing machinery 17and equipment, including repair and replacement parts, both 18new and used, including that manufactured on special order, 19certified by the purchaser to be used primarily for 20photoprocessing, and including photoprocessing machinery and 21equipment purchased for lease.22    (12) Until July 1, 2028, coal and aggregate exploration, 23mining, off-highway hauling, processing, maintenance, and 24reclamation equipment, including replacement parts and 25equipment, and including equipment purchased for lease, but 26excluding motor vehicles required to be registered under the   SB1633- 32 -LRB104 08081 HLH 18127 b1Illinois Vehicle Code. The changes made to this Section by 2Public Act 97-767 apply on and after July 1, 2003, but no claim 3for credit or refund is allowed on or after August 16, 2013 4(the effective date of Public Act 98-456) for such taxes paid 5during the period beginning July 1, 2003 and ending on August 616, 2013 (the effective date of Public Act 98-456).7    (13) Semen used for artificial insemination of livestock 8for direct agricultural production.9    (14) Horses, or interests in horses, registered with and 10meeting the requirements of any of the Arabian Horse Club 11Registry of America, Appaloosa Horse Club, American Quarter 12Horse Association, United States Trotting Association, or 13Jockey Club, as appropriate, used for purposes of breeding or 14racing for prizes. This item (14) is exempt from the 15provisions of Section 3-75, and the exemption provided for 16under this item (14) applies for all periods beginning May 30, 171995, but no claim for credit or refund is allowed on or after 18January 1, 2008 (the effective date of Public Act 95-88) for 19such taxes paid during the period beginning May 30, 2000 and 20ending on January 1, 2008 (the effective date of Public Act 2195-88).22    (15) Computers and communications equipment utilized for 23any hospital purpose and equipment used in the diagnosis, 24analysis, or treatment of hospital patients purchased by a 25lessor who leases the equipment, under a lease of one year or 26longer executed or in effect at the time the lessor would   SB1633- 33 -LRB104 08081 HLH 18127 b1otherwise be subject to the tax imposed by this Act, to a 2hospital that has been issued an active tax exemption 3identification number by the Department under Section 1g of 4the Retailers' Occupation Tax Act. If the equipment is leased 5in a manner that does not qualify for this exemption or is used 6in any other non-exempt manner, the lessor shall be liable for 7the tax imposed under this Act or the Use Tax Act, as the case 8may be, based on the fair market value of the property at the 9time the non-qualifying use occurs. No lessor shall collect or 10attempt to collect an amount (however designated) that 11purports to reimburse that lessor for the tax imposed by this 12Act or the Use Tax Act, as the case may be, if the tax has not 13been paid by the lessor. If a lessor improperly collects any 14such amount from the lessee, the lessee shall have a legal 15right to claim a refund of that amount from the lessor. If, 16however, that amount is not refunded to the lessee for any 17reason, the lessor is liable to pay that amount to the 18Department.19    (16) Personal property purchased by a lessor who leases 20the property, under a lease of one year or longer executed or 21in effect at the time the lessor would otherwise be subject to 22the tax imposed by this Act, to a governmental body that has 23been issued an active tax exemption identification number by 24the Department under Section 1g of the Retailers' Occupation 25Tax Act. If the property is leased in a manner that does not 26qualify for this exemption or is used in any other non-exempt   SB1633- 34 -LRB104 08081 HLH 18127 b1manner, the lessor shall be liable for the tax imposed under 2this Act or the Use Tax Act, as the case may be, based on the 3fair market value of the property at the time the 4non-qualifying use occurs. No lessor shall collect or attempt 5to collect an amount (however designated) that purports to 6reimburse that lessor for the tax imposed by this Act or the 7Use Tax Act, as the case may be, if the tax has not been paid 8by the lessor. If a lessor improperly collects any such amount 9from the lessee, the lessee shall have a legal right to claim a 10refund of that amount from the lessor. If, however, that 11amount is not refunded to the lessee for any reason, the lessor 12is liable to pay that amount to the Department.13    (17) Beginning with taxable years ending on or after 14December 31, 1995 and ending with taxable years ending on or 15before December 31, 2004, personal property that is donated 16for disaster relief to be used in a State or federally declared 17disaster area in Illinois or bordering Illinois by a 18manufacturer or retailer that is registered in this State to a 19corporation, society, association, foundation, or institution 20that has been issued a sales tax exemption identification 21number by the Department that assists victims of the disaster 22who reside within the declared disaster area.23    (18) Beginning with taxable years ending on or after 24December 31, 1995 and ending with taxable years ending on or 25before December 31, 2004, personal property that is used in 26the performance of infrastructure repairs in this State,   SB1633- 35 -LRB104 08081 HLH 18127 b1including, but not limited to, municipal roads and streets, 2access roads, bridges, sidewalks, waste disposal systems, 3water and sewer line extensions, water distribution and 4purification facilities, storm water drainage and retention 5facilities, and sewage treatment facilities, resulting from a 6State or federally declared disaster in Illinois or bordering 7Illinois when such repairs are initiated on facilities located 8in the declared disaster area within 6 months after the 9disaster.10    (19) Beginning July 1, 1999, game or game birds purchased 11at a "game breeding and hunting preserve area" as that term is 12used in the Wildlife Code. This paragraph is exempt from the 13provisions of Section 3-75.14    (20) A motor vehicle, as that term is defined in Section 151-146 of the Illinois Vehicle Code, that is donated to a 16corporation, limited liability company, society, association, 17foundation, or institution that is determined by the 18Department to be organized and operated exclusively for 19educational purposes. For purposes of this exemption, "a 20corporation, limited liability company, society, association, 21foundation, or institution organized and operated exclusively 22for educational purposes" means all tax-supported public 23schools, private schools that offer systematic instruction in 24useful branches of learning by methods common to public 25schools and that compare favorably in their scope and 26intensity with the course of study presented in tax-supported   SB1633- 36 -LRB104 08081 HLH 18127 b1schools, and vocational or technical schools or institutes 2organized and operated exclusively to provide a course of 3study of not less than 6 weeks duration and designed to prepare 4individuals to follow a trade or to pursue a manual, 5technical, mechanical, industrial, business, or commercial 6occupation.7    (21) Beginning January 1, 2000, personal property, 8including food, purchased through fundraising events for the 9benefit of a public or private elementary or secondary school, 10a group of those schools, or one or more school districts if 11the events are sponsored by an entity recognized by the school 12district that consists primarily of volunteers and includes 13parents and teachers of the school children. This paragraph 14does not apply to fundraising events (i) for the benefit of 15private home instruction or (ii) for which the fundraising 16entity purchases the personal property sold at the events from 17another individual or entity that sold the property for the 18purpose of resale by the fundraising entity and that profits 19from the sale to the fundraising entity. This paragraph is 20exempt from the provisions of Section 3-75.21    (22) Beginning January 1, 2000 and through December 31, 222001, new or used automatic vending machines that prepare and 23serve hot food and beverages, including coffee, soup, and 24other items, and replacement parts for these machines. 25Beginning January 1, 2002 and through June 30, 2003, machines 26and parts for machines used in commercial, coin-operated   SB1633- 37 -LRB104 08081 HLH 18127 b1amusement and vending business if a use or occupation tax is 2paid on the gross receipts derived from the use of the 3commercial, coin-operated amusement and vending machines. This 4paragraph is exempt from the provisions of Section 3-75.5    (23) Beginning August 23, 2001 and through June 30, 2016, 6food for human consumption that is to be consumed off the 7premises where it is sold (other than alcoholic beverages, 8soft drinks, and food that has been prepared for immediate 9consumption) and prescription and nonprescription medicines, 10drugs, medical appliances, and insulin, urine testing 11materials, syringes, and needles used by diabetics, for human 12use, when purchased for use by a person receiving medical 13assistance under Article V of the Illinois Public Aid Code who 14resides in a licensed long-term care facility, as defined in 15the Nursing Home Care Act, or in a licensed facility as defined 16in the ID/DD Community Care Act, the MC/DD Act, or the 17Specialized Mental Health Rehabilitation Act of 2013.18    (24) Beginning on August 2, 2001 (the effective date of 19Public Act 92-227), computers and communications equipment 20utilized for any hospital purpose and equipment used in the 21diagnosis, analysis, or treatment of hospital patients 22purchased by a lessor who leases the equipment, under a lease 23of one year or longer executed or in effect at the time the 24lessor would otherwise be subject to the tax imposed by this 25Act, to a hospital that has been issued an active tax exemption 26identification number by the Department under Section 1g of   SB1633- 38 -LRB104 08081 HLH 18127 b1the Retailers' Occupation Tax Act. If the equipment is leased 2in a manner that does not qualify for this exemption or is used 3in any other nonexempt manner, the lessor shall be liable for 4the tax imposed under this Act or the Use Tax Act, as the case 5may be, based on the fair market value of the property at the 6time the nonqualifying use occurs. No lessor shall collect or 7attempt to collect an amount (however designated) that 8purports to reimburse that lessor for the tax imposed by this 9Act or the Use Tax Act, as the case may be, if the tax has not 10been paid by the lessor. If a lessor improperly collects any 11such amount from the lessee, the lessee shall have a legal 12right to claim a refund of that amount from the lessor. If, 13however, that amount is not refunded to the lessee for any 14reason, the lessor is liable to pay that amount to the 15Department. This paragraph is exempt from the provisions of 16Section 3-75.17    (25) Beginning on August 2, 2001 (the effective date of 18Public Act 92-227), personal property purchased by a lessor 19who leases the property, under a lease of one year or longer 20executed or in effect at the time the lessor would otherwise be 21subject to the tax imposed by this Act, to a governmental body 22that has been issued an active tax exemption identification 23number by the Department under Section 1g of the Retailers' 24Occupation Tax Act. If the property is leased in a manner that 25does not qualify for this exemption or is used in any other 26nonexempt manner, the lessor shall be liable for the tax   SB1633- 39 -LRB104 08081 HLH 18127 b1imposed under this Act or the Use Tax Act, as the case may be, 2based on the fair market value of the property at the time the 3nonqualifying use occurs. No lessor shall collect or attempt 4to collect an amount (however designated) that purports to 5reimburse that lessor for the tax imposed by this Act or the 6Use Tax Act, as the case may be, if the tax has not been paid 7by the lessor. If a lessor improperly collects any such amount 8from the lessee, the lessee shall have a legal right to claim a 9refund of that amount from the lessor. If, however, that 10amount is not refunded to the lessee for any reason, the lessor 11is liable to pay that amount to the Department. This paragraph 12is exempt from the provisions of Section 3-75.13    (26) Beginning January 1, 2008, tangible personal property 14used in the construction or maintenance of a community water 15supply, as defined under Section 3.145 of the Environmental 16Protection Act, that is operated by a not-for-profit 17corporation that holds a valid water supply permit issued 18under Title IV of the Environmental Protection Act. This 19paragraph is exempt from the provisions of Section 3-75. 20    (27) Beginning January 1, 2010 and continuing through 21December 31, 2029, materials, parts, equipment, components, 22and furnishings incorporated into or upon an aircraft as part 23of the modification, refurbishment, completion, replacement, 24repair, or maintenance of the aircraft. This exemption 25includes consumable supplies used in the modification, 26refurbishment, completion, replacement, repair, and   SB1633- 40 -LRB104 08081 HLH 18127 b1maintenance of aircraft. However, until January 1, 2024, this 2exemption excludes any materials, parts, equipment, 3components, and consumable supplies used in the modification, 4replacement, repair, and maintenance of aircraft engines or 5power plants, whether such engines or power plants are 6installed or uninstalled upon any such aircraft. "Consumable 7supplies" include, but are not limited to, adhesive, tape, 8sandpaper, general purpose lubricants, cleaning solution, 9latex gloves, and protective films. 10    Beginning January 1, 2010 and continuing through December 1131, 2023, this exemption applies only to the use of qualifying 12tangible personal property transferred incident to the 13modification, refurbishment, completion, replacement, repair, 14or maintenance of aircraft by persons who (i) hold an Air 15Agency Certificate and are empowered to operate an approved 16repair station by the Federal Aviation Administration, (ii) 17have a Class IV Rating, and (iii) conduct operations in 18accordance with Part 145 of the Federal Aviation Regulations. 19From January 1, 2024 through December 31, 2029, this exemption 20applies only to the use of qualifying tangible personal 21property transferred incident to: (A) the modification, 22refurbishment, completion, repair, replacement, or maintenance 23of an aircraft by persons who (i) hold an Air Agency 24Certificate and are empowered to operate an approved repair 25station by the Federal Aviation Administration, (ii) have a 26Class IV Rating, and (iii) conduct operations in accordance   SB1633- 41 -LRB104 08081 HLH 18127 b1with Part 145 of the Federal Aviation Regulations; and (B) the 2modification, replacement, repair, and maintenance of aircraft 3engines or power plants without regard to whether or not those 4persons meet the qualifications of item (A).5    The exemption does not include aircraft operated by a 6commercial air carrier providing scheduled passenger air 7service pursuant to authority issued under Part 121 or Part 8129 of the Federal Aviation Regulations. The changes made to 9this paragraph (27) by Public Act 98-534 are declarative of 10existing law. It is the intent of the General Assembly that the 11exemption under this paragraph (27) applies continuously from 12January 1, 2010 through December 31, 2024; however, no claim 13for credit or refund is allowed for taxes paid as a result of 14the disallowance of this exemption on or after January 1, 2015 15and prior to February 5, 2020 (the effective date of Public Act 16101-629).17    (28) Tangible personal property purchased by a 18public-facilities corporation, as described in Section 1911-65-10 of the Illinois Municipal Code, for purposes of 20constructing or furnishing a municipal convention hall, but 21only if the legal title to the municipal convention hall is 22transferred to the municipality without any further 23consideration by or on behalf of the municipality at the time 24of the completion of the municipal convention hall or upon the 25retirement or redemption of any bonds or other debt 26instruments issued by the public-facilities corporation in   SB1633- 42 -LRB104 08081 HLH 18127 b1connection with the development of the municipal convention 2hall. This exemption includes existing public-facilities 3corporations as provided in Section 11-65-25 of the Illinois 4Municipal Code. This paragraph is exempt from the provisions 5of Section 3-75. 6    (29) Beginning January 1, 2017 and through December 31, 72026, menstrual pads, tampons, and menstrual cups. 8    (30) Tangible personal property transferred to a purchaser 9who is exempt from the tax imposed by this Act by operation of 10federal law. This paragraph is exempt from the provisions of 11Section 3-75. 12    (31) Qualified tangible personal property used in the 13construction or operation of a data center that has been 14granted a certificate of exemption by the Department of 15Commerce and Economic Opportunity, whether that tangible 16personal property is purchased by the owner, operator, or 17tenant of the data center or by a contractor or subcontractor 18of the owner, operator, or tenant. Data centers that would 19have qualified for a certificate of exemption prior to January 201, 2020 had Public Act 101-31 been in effect, may apply for and 21obtain an exemption for subsequent purchases of computer 22equipment or enabling software purchased or leased to upgrade, 23supplement, or replace computer equipment or enabling software 24purchased or leased in the original investment that would have 25qualified. 26    The Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity shall   SB1633- 43 -LRB104 08081 HLH 18127 b1grant a certificate of exemption under this item (31) to 2qualified data centers as defined by Section 605-1025 of the 3Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity Law of the 4Civil Administrative Code of Illinois. 5    For the purposes of this item (31): 6        "Data center" means a building or a series of 7    buildings rehabilitated or constructed to house working 8    servers in one physical location or multiple sites within 9    the State of Illinois. 10        "Qualified tangible personal property" means: 11    electrical systems and equipment; climate control and 12    chilling equipment and systems; mechanical systems and 13    equipment; monitoring and secure systems; emergency 14    generators; hardware; computers; servers; data storage 15    devices; network connectivity equipment; racks; cabinets; 16    telecommunications cabling infrastructure; raised floor 17    systems; peripheral components or systems; software; 18    mechanical, electrical, or plumbing systems; battery 19    systems; cooling systems and towers; temperature control 20    systems; other cabling; and other data center 21    infrastructure equipment and systems necessary to operate 22    qualified tangible personal property, including fixtures; 23    and component parts of any of the foregoing, including 24    installation, maintenance, repair, refurbishment, and 25    replacement of qualified tangible personal property to 26    generate, transform, transmit, distribute, or manage   SB1633- 44 -LRB104 08081 HLH 18127 b1    electricity necessary to operate qualified tangible 2    personal property; and all other tangible personal 3    property that is essential to the operations of a computer 4    data center. The term "qualified tangible personal 5    property" also includes building materials physically 6    incorporated into the qualifying data center. To document 7    the exemption allowed under this Section, the retailer 8    must obtain from the purchaser a copy of the certificate 9    of eligibility issued by the Department of Commerce and 10    Economic Opportunity. 11    This item (31) is exempt from the provisions of Section 123-75. 13    (32) Beginning July 1, 2022, breast pumps, breast pump 14collection and storage supplies, and breast pump kits. This 15item (32) is exempt from the provisions of Section 3-75. As 16used in this item (32): 17        "Breast pump" means an electrically controlled or 18    manually controlled pump device designed or marketed to be 19    used to express milk from a human breast during lactation, 20    including the pump device and any battery, AC adapter, or 21    other power supply unit that is used to power the pump 22    device and is packaged and sold with the pump device at the 23    time of sale. 24        "Breast pump collection and storage supplies" means 25    items of tangible personal property designed or marketed 26    to be used in conjunction with a breast pump to collect   SB1633- 45 -LRB104 08081 HLH 18127 b1    milk expressed from a human breast and to store collected 2    milk until it is ready for consumption. 3        "Breast pump collection and storage supplies" 4    includes, but is not limited to: breast shields and breast 5    shield connectors; breast pump tubes and tubing adapters; 6    breast pump valves and membranes; backflow protectors and 7    backflow protector adaptors; bottles and bottle caps 8    specific to the operation of the breast pump; and breast 9    milk storage bags. 10        "Breast pump collection and storage supplies" does not 11    include: (1) bottles and bottle caps not specific to the 12    operation of the breast pump; (2) breast pump travel bags 13    and other similar carrying accessories, including ice 14    packs, labels, and other similar products; (3) breast pump 15    cleaning supplies; (4) nursing bras, bra pads, breast 16    shells, and other similar products; and (5) creams, 17    ointments, and other similar products that relieve 18    breastfeeding-related symptoms or conditions of the 19    breasts or nipples, unless sold as part of a breast pump 20    kit that is pre-packaged by the breast pump manufacturer 21    or distributor. 22        "Breast pump kit" means a kit that: (1) contains no 23    more than a breast pump, breast pump collection and 24    storage supplies, a rechargeable battery for operating the 25    breast pump, a breastmilk cooler, bottle stands, ice 26    packs, and a breast pump carrying case; and (2) is   SB1633- 46 -LRB104 08081 HLH 18127 b1    pre-packaged as a breast pump kit by the breast pump 2    manufacturer or distributor. 3    (33) Tangible personal property sold by or on behalf of 4the State Treasurer pursuant to the Revised Uniform Unclaimed 5Property Act. This item (33) is exempt from the provisions of 6Section 3-75. 7    (34) Beginning on January 1, 2024, tangible personal 8property purchased by an active duty member of the armed 9forces of the United States who presents valid military 10identification and purchases the property using a form of 11payment where the federal government is the payor. The member 12of the armed forces must complete, at the point of sale, a form 13prescribed by the Department of Revenue documenting that the 14transaction is eligible for the exemption under this 15paragraph. Retailers must keep the form as documentation of 16the exemption in their records for a period of not less than 6 17years. "Armed forces of the United States" means the United 18States Army, Navy, Air Force, Space Force, Marine Corps, or 19Coast Guard. This paragraph is exempt from the provisions of 20Section 3-75. 21    (35) Beginning July 1, 2024, home-delivered meals provided 22to Medicare or Medicaid recipients when payment is made by an 23intermediary, such as a Medicare Administrative Contractor, a 24Managed Care Organization, or a Medicare Advantage 25Organization, pursuant to a government contract. This 26paragraph (35) is exempt from the provisions of Section 3-75.   SB1633- 47 -LRB104 08081 HLH 18127 b1    (36) (35) Beginning on January 1, 2026, as further defined 2in Section 3-10, food prepared for immediate consumption and 3transferred incident to a sale of service subject to this Act 4or the Service Occupation Tax Act by an entity licensed under 5the Hospital Licensing Act, the Nursing Home Care Act, the 6Assisted Living and Shared Housing Act, the ID/DD Community 7Care Act, the MC/DD Act, the Specialized Mental Health 8Rehabilitation Act of 2013, or the Child Care Act of 1969, or 9by an entity that holds a permit issued pursuant to the Life 10Care Facilities Act. This item (36) (35) is exempt from the 11provisions of Section 3-75. 12    (37) (36) Beginning on January 1, 2026, as further defined 13in Section 3-10, food for human consumption that is to be 14consumed off the premises where it is sold (other than 15alcoholic beverages, food consisting of or infused with adult 16use cannabis, soft drinks, candy, and food that has been 17prepared for immediate consumption). This item (37) (36) is 18exempt from the provisions of Section 3-75. 19    (38) (35) Use by a lessee of the following leased tangible 20personal property:21        (1) software transferred subject to a license that 22    meets the following requirements:23            (A) it is evidenced by a written agreement signed 24        by the licensor and the customer;25                (i) an electronic agreement in which the 26            customer accepts the license by means of an   SB1633- 48 -LRB104 08081 HLH 18127 b1            electronic signature that is verifiable and can be 2            authenticated and is attached to or made part of 3            the license will comply with this requirement;4                (ii) a license agreement in which the customer 5            electronically accepts the terms by clicking "I 6            agree" does not comply with this requirement;7            (B) it restricts the customer's duplication and 8        use of the software;9            (C) it prohibits the customer from licensing, 10        sublicensing, or transferring the software to a third 11        party (except to a related party) without the 12        permission and continued control of the licensor;13            (D) the licensor has a policy of providing another 14        copy at minimal or no charge if the customer loses or 15        damages the software, or of permitting the licensee to 16        make and keep an archival copy, and such policy is 17        either stated in the license agreement, supported by 18        the licensor's books and records, or supported by a 19        notarized statement made under penalties of perjury by 20        the licensor; and21            (E) the customer must destroy or return all copies 22        of the software to the licensor at the end of the 23        license period; this provision is deemed to be met, in 24        the case of a perpetual license, without being set 25        forth in the license agreement; and26        (2) property that is subject to a tax on lease   SB1633- 49 -LRB104 08081 HLH 18127 b1    receipts imposed by a home rule unit of local government 2    if the ordinance imposing that tax was adopted prior to 3    January 1, 2023; and . 4        (3) solar energy systems, as defined in Section 10-5 5    of the Property Tax Code. 6(Source: P.A. 102-16, eff. 6-17-21; 102-700, Article 70, 7Section 70-10, eff. 4-19-22; 102-700, Article 75, Section 875-10, eff. 4-19-22; 102-1026, eff. 5-27-22; 103-9, Article 5, 9Section 5-10, eff. 6-7-23; 103-9, Article 15, Section 15-10, 10eff. 6-7-23; 103-154, eff. 6-30-23; 103-384, eff. 1-1-24; 11103-592, eff. 1-1-25; 103-605, eff. 7-1-24; 103-643, eff. 127-1-24; 103-746, eff. 1-1-25; 103-781, eff. 8-5-24; 103-995, 13eff. 8-9-24; revised 11-26-24.) 14    Section 15. The Service Occupation Tax Act is amended by 15changing Section 3-5 as follows: 16    (35 ILCS 115/3-5)17    Sec. 3-5. Exemptions. The following tangible personal 18property is exempt from the tax imposed by this Act:19    (1) Personal property sold by a corporation, society, 20association, foundation, institution, or organization, other 21than a limited liability company, that is organized and 22operated as a not-for-profit service enterprise for the 23benefit of persons 65 years of age or older if the personal 24property was not purchased by the enterprise for the purpose   SB1633- 50 -LRB104 08081 HLH 18127 b1of resale by the enterprise.2    (2) Personal property purchased by a not-for-profit 3Illinois county fair association for use in conducting, 4operating, or promoting the county fair.5    (3) Personal property purchased by any not-for-profit arts 6or cultural organization that establishes, by proof required 7by the Department by rule, that it has received an exemption 8under Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code and that 9is organized and operated primarily for the presentation or 10support of arts or cultural programming, activities, or 11services. These organizations include, but are not limited to, 12music and dramatic arts organizations such as symphony 13orchestras and theatrical groups, arts and cultural service 14organizations, local arts councils, visual arts organizations, 15and media arts organizations. On and after July 1, 2001 (the 16effective date of Public Act 92-35), however, an entity 17otherwise eligible for this exemption shall not make tax-free 18purchases unless it has an active identification number issued 19by the Department.20    (4) Legal tender, currency, medallions, or gold or silver 21coinage issued by the State of Illinois, the government of the 22United States of America, or the government of any foreign 23country, and bullion.24    (5) Until July 1, 2003 and beginning again on September 1, 252004 through August 30, 2014, graphic arts machinery and 26equipment, including repair and replacement parts, both new   SB1633- 51 -LRB104 08081 HLH 18127 b1and used, and including that manufactured on special order or 2purchased for lease, certified by the purchaser to be used 3primarily for graphic arts production. Equipment includes 4chemicals or chemicals acting as catalysts but only if the 5chemicals or chemicals acting as catalysts effect a direct and 6immediate change upon a graphic arts product. Beginning on 7July 1, 2017, graphic arts machinery and equipment is included 8in the manufacturing and assembling machinery and equipment 9exemption under Section 2 of this Act.10    (6) Personal property sold by a teacher-sponsored student 11organization affiliated with an elementary or secondary school 12located in Illinois.13    (7) Farm machinery and equipment, both new and used, 14including that manufactured on special order, certified by the 15purchaser to be used primarily for production agriculture or 16State or federal agricultural programs, including individual 17replacement parts for the machinery and equipment, including 18machinery and equipment purchased for lease, and including 19implements of husbandry defined in Section 1-130 of the 20Illinois Vehicle Code, farm machinery and agricultural 21chemical and fertilizer spreaders, and nurse wagons required 22to be registered under Section 3-809 of the Illinois Vehicle 23Code, but excluding other motor vehicles required to be 24registered under the Illinois Vehicle Code. Horticultural 25polyhouses or hoop houses used for propagating, growing, or 26overwintering plants shall be considered farm machinery and   SB1633- 52 -LRB104 08081 HLH 18127 b1equipment under this item (7). Agricultural chemical tender 2tanks and dry boxes shall include units sold separately from a 3motor vehicle required to be licensed and units sold mounted 4on a motor vehicle required to be licensed if the selling price 5of the tender is separately stated.6    Farm machinery and equipment shall include precision 7farming equipment that is installed or purchased to be 8installed on farm machinery and equipment, including, but not 9limited to, tractors, harvesters, sprayers, planters, seeders, 10or spreaders. Precision farming equipment includes, but is not 11limited to, soil testing sensors, computers, monitors, 12software, global positioning and mapping systems, and other 13such equipment.14    Farm machinery and equipment also includes computers, 15sensors, software, and related equipment used primarily in the 16computer-assisted operation of production agriculture 17facilities, equipment, and activities such as, but not limited 18to, the collection, monitoring, and correlation of animal and 19crop data for the purpose of formulating animal diets and 20agricultural chemicals. 21    Beginning on January 1, 2024, farm machinery and equipment 22also includes electrical power generation equipment used 23primarily for production agriculture. 24    This item (7) is exempt from the provisions of Section 253-55.26    (8) Until June 30, 2013, fuel and petroleum products sold   SB1633- 53 -LRB104 08081 HLH 18127 b1to or used by an air common carrier, certified by the carrier 2to be used for consumption, shipment, or storage in the 3conduct of its business as an air common carrier, for a flight 4destined for or returning from a location or locations outside 5the United States without regard to previous or subsequent 6domestic stopovers.7    Beginning July 1, 2013, fuel and petroleum products sold 8to or used by an air carrier, certified by the carrier to be 9used for consumption, shipment, or storage in the conduct of 10its business as an air common carrier, for a flight that (i) is 11engaged in foreign trade or is engaged in trade between the 12United States and any of its possessions and (ii) transports 13at least one individual or package for hire from the city of 14origination to the city of final destination on the same 15aircraft, without regard to a change in the flight number of 16that aircraft. 17    (9) Proceeds of mandatory service charges separately 18stated on customers' bills for the purchase and consumption of 19food and beverages, to the extent that the proceeds of the 20service charge are in fact turned over as tips or as a 21substitute for tips to the employees who participate directly 22in preparing, serving, hosting or cleaning up the food or 23beverage function with respect to which the service charge is 24imposed.25    (10) Until July 1, 2003, oil field exploration, drilling, 26and production equipment, including (i) rigs and parts of   SB1633- 54 -LRB104 08081 HLH 18127 b1rigs, rotary rigs, cable tool rigs, and workover rigs, (ii) 2pipe and tubular goods, including casing and drill strings, 3(iii) pumps and pump-jack units, (iv) storage tanks and flow 4lines, (v) any individual replacement part for oil field 5exploration, drilling, and production equipment, and (vi) 6machinery and equipment purchased for lease; but excluding 7motor vehicles required to be registered under the Illinois 8Vehicle Code.9    (11) Photoprocessing machinery and equipment, including 10repair and replacement parts, both new and used, including 11that manufactured on special order, certified by the purchaser 12to be used primarily for photoprocessing, and including 13photoprocessing machinery and equipment purchased for lease.14    (12) Until July 1, 2028, coal and aggregate exploration, 15mining, off-highway hauling, processing, maintenance, and 16reclamation equipment, including replacement parts and 17equipment, and including equipment purchased for lease, but 18excluding motor vehicles required to be registered under the 19Illinois Vehicle Code. The changes made to this Section by 20Public Act 97-767 apply on and after July 1, 2003, but no claim 21for credit or refund is allowed on or after August 16, 2013 22(the effective date of Public Act 98-456) for such taxes paid 23during the period beginning July 1, 2003 and ending on August 2416, 2013 (the effective date of Public Act 98-456).25    (13) Beginning January 1, 1992 and through June 30, 2016, 26food for human consumption that is to be consumed off the   SB1633- 55 -LRB104 08081 HLH 18127 b1premises where it is sold (other than alcoholic beverages, 2soft drinks and food that has been prepared for immediate 3consumption) and prescription and non-prescription medicines, 4drugs, medical appliances, and insulin, urine testing 5materials, syringes, and needles used by diabetics, for human 6use, when purchased for use by a person receiving medical 7assistance under Article V of the Illinois Public Aid Code who 8resides in a licensed long-term care facility, as defined in 9the Nursing Home Care Act, or in a licensed facility as defined 10in the ID/DD Community Care Act, the MC/DD Act, or the 11Specialized Mental Health Rehabilitation Act of 2013.12    (14) Semen used for artificial insemination of livestock 13for direct agricultural production.14    (15) Horses, or interests in horses, registered with and 15meeting the requirements of any of the Arabian Horse Club 16Registry of America, Appaloosa Horse Club, American Quarter 17Horse Association, United States Trotting Association, or 18Jockey Club, as appropriate, used for purposes of breeding or 19racing for prizes. This item (15) is exempt from the 20provisions of Section 3-55, and the exemption provided for 21under this item (15) applies for all periods beginning May 30, 221995, but no claim for credit or refund is allowed on or after 23January 1, 2008 (the effective date of Public Act 95-88) for 24such taxes paid during the period beginning May 30, 2000 and 25ending on January 1, 2008 (the effective date of Public Act 2695-88).  SB1633- 56 -LRB104 08081 HLH 18127 b1    (16) Computers and communications equipment utilized for 2any hospital purpose and equipment used in the diagnosis, 3analysis, or treatment of hospital patients sold to a lessor 4who leases the equipment, under a lease of one year or longer 5executed or in effect at the time of the purchase, to a 6hospital that has been issued an active tax exemption 7identification number by the Department under Section 1g of 8the Retailers' Occupation Tax Act.9    (17) Personal property sold to a lessor who leases the 10property, under a lease of one year or longer executed or in 11effect at the time of the purchase, to a governmental body that 12has been issued an active tax exemption identification number 13by the Department under Section 1g of the Retailers' 14Occupation Tax Act.15    (18) Beginning with taxable years ending on or after 16December 31, 1995 and ending with taxable years ending on or 17before December 31, 2004, personal property that is donated 18for disaster relief to be used in a State or federally declared 19disaster area in Illinois or bordering Illinois by a 20manufacturer or retailer that is registered in this State to a 21corporation, society, association, foundation, or institution 22that has been issued a sales tax exemption identification 23number by the Department that assists victims of the disaster 24who reside within the declared disaster area.25    (19) Beginning with taxable years ending on or after 26December 31, 1995 and ending with taxable years ending on or   SB1633- 57 -LRB104 08081 HLH 18127 b1before December 31, 2004, personal property that is used in 2the performance of infrastructure repairs in this State, 3including, but not limited to, municipal roads and streets, 4access roads, bridges, sidewalks, waste disposal systems, 5water and sewer line extensions, water distribution and 6purification facilities, storm water drainage and retention 7facilities, and sewage treatment facilities, resulting from a 8State or federally declared disaster in Illinois or bordering 9Illinois when such repairs are initiated on facilities located 10in the declared disaster area within 6 months after the 11disaster.12    (20) Beginning July 1, 1999, game or game birds sold at a 13"game breeding and hunting preserve area" as that term is used 14in the Wildlife Code. This paragraph is exempt from the 15provisions of Section 3-55.16    (21) A motor vehicle, as that term is defined in Section 171-146 of the Illinois Vehicle Code, that is donated to a 18corporation, limited liability company, society, association, 19foundation, or institution that is determined by the 20Department to be organized and operated exclusively for 21educational purposes. For purposes of this exemption, "a 22corporation, limited liability company, society, association, 23foundation, or institution organized and operated exclusively 24for educational purposes" means all tax-supported public 25schools, private schools that offer systematic instruction in 26useful branches of learning by methods common to public   SB1633- 58 -LRB104 08081 HLH 18127 b1schools and that compare favorably in their scope and 2intensity with the course of study presented in tax-supported 3schools, and vocational or technical schools or institutes 4organized and operated exclusively to provide a course of 5study of not less than 6 weeks duration and designed to prepare 6individuals to follow a trade or to pursue a manual, 7technical, mechanical, industrial, business, or commercial 8occupation.9    (22) Beginning January 1, 2000, personal property, 10including food, purchased through fundraising events for the 11benefit of a public or private elementary or secondary school, 12a group of those schools, or one or more school districts if 13the events are sponsored by an entity recognized by the school 14district that consists primarily of volunteers and includes 15parents and teachers of the school children. This paragraph 16does not apply to fundraising events (i) for the benefit of 17private home instruction or (ii) for which the fundraising 18entity purchases the personal property sold at the events from 19another individual or entity that sold the property for the 20purpose of resale by the fundraising entity and that profits 21from the sale to the fundraising entity. This paragraph is 22exempt from the provisions of Section 3-55.23    (23) Beginning January 1, 2000 and through December 31, 242001, new or used automatic vending machines that prepare and 25serve hot food and beverages, including coffee, soup, and 26other items, and replacement parts for these machines.   SB1633- 59 -LRB104 08081 HLH 18127 b1Beginning January 1, 2002 and through June 30, 2003, machines 2and parts for machines used in commercial, coin-operated 3amusement and vending business if a use or occupation tax is 4paid on the gross receipts derived from the use of the 5commercial, coin-operated amusement and vending machines. This 6paragraph is exempt from the provisions of Section 3-55.7    (24) Beginning on August 2, 2001 (the effective date of 8Public Act 92-227), computers and communications equipment 9utilized for any hospital purpose and equipment used in the 10diagnosis, analysis, or treatment of hospital patients sold to 11a lessor who leases the equipment, under a lease of one year or 12longer executed or in effect at the time of the purchase, to a 13hospital that has been issued an active tax exemption 14identification number by the Department under Section 1g of 15the Retailers' Occupation Tax Act. This paragraph is exempt 16from the provisions of Section 3-55.17    (25) Beginning on August 2, 2001 (the effective date of 18Public Act 92-227), personal property sold to a lessor who 19leases the property, under a lease of one year or longer 20executed or in effect at the time of the purchase, to a 21governmental body that has been issued an active tax exemption 22identification number by the Department under Section 1g of 23the Retailers' Occupation Tax Act. This paragraph is exempt 24from the provisions of Section 3-55.25    (26) Beginning on January 1, 2002 and through June 30, 262016, tangible personal property purchased from an Illinois   SB1633- 60 -LRB104 08081 HLH 18127 b1retailer by a taxpayer engaged in centralized purchasing 2activities in Illinois who will, upon receipt of the property 3in Illinois, temporarily store the property in Illinois (i) 4for the purpose of subsequently transporting it outside this 5State for use or consumption thereafter solely outside this 6State or (ii) for the purpose of being processed, fabricated, 7or manufactured into, attached to, or incorporated into other 8tangible personal property to be transported outside this 9State and thereafter used or consumed solely outside this 10State. The Director of Revenue shall, pursuant to rules 11adopted in accordance with the Illinois Administrative 12Procedure Act, issue a permit to any taxpayer in good standing 13with the Department who is eligible for the exemption under 14this paragraph (26). The permit issued under this paragraph 15(26) shall authorize the holder, to the extent and in the 16manner specified in the rules adopted under this Act, to 17purchase tangible personal property from a retailer exempt 18from the taxes imposed by this Act. Taxpayers shall maintain 19all necessary books and records to substantiate the use and 20consumption of all such tangible personal property outside of 21the State of Illinois.22    (27) Beginning January 1, 2008, tangible personal property 23used in the construction or maintenance of a community water 24supply, as defined under Section 3.145 of the Environmental 25Protection Act, that is operated by a not-for-profit 26corporation that holds a valid water supply permit issued   SB1633- 61 -LRB104 08081 HLH 18127 b1under Title IV of the Environmental Protection Act. This 2paragraph is exempt from the provisions of Section 3-55. 3    (28) Tangible personal property sold to a 4public-facilities corporation, as described in Section 511-65-10 of the Illinois Municipal Code, for purposes of 6constructing or furnishing a municipal convention hall, but 7only if the legal title to the municipal convention hall is 8transferred to the municipality without any further 9consideration by or on behalf of the municipality at the time 10of the completion of the municipal convention hall or upon the 11retirement or redemption of any bonds or other debt 12instruments issued by the public-facilities corporation in 13connection with the development of the municipal convention 14hall. This exemption includes existing public-facilities 15corporations as provided in Section 11-65-25 of the Illinois 16Municipal Code. This paragraph is exempt from the provisions 17of Section 3-55. 18    (29) Beginning January 1, 2010 and continuing through 19December 31, 2029, materials, parts, equipment, components, 20and furnishings incorporated into or upon an aircraft as part 21of the modification, refurbishment, completion, replacement, 22repair, or maintenance of the aircraft. This exemption 23includes consumable supplies used in the modification, 24refurbishment, completion, replacement, repair, and 25maintenance of aircraft. However, until January 1, 2024, this 26exemption excludes any materials, parts, equipment,   SB1633- 62 -LRB104 08081 HLH 18127 b1components, and consumable supplies used in the modification, 2replacement, repair, and maintenance of aircraft engines or 3power plants, whether such engines or power plants are 4installed or uninstalled upon any such aircraft. "Consumable 5supplies" include, but are not limited to, adhesive, tape, 6sandpaper, general purpose lubricants, cleaning solution, 7latex gloves, and protective films. 8    Beginning January 1, 2010 and continuing through December 931, 2023, this exemption applies only to the transfer of 10qualifying tangible personal property incident to the 11modification, refurbishment, completion, replacement, repair, 12or maintenance of an aircraft by persons who (i) hold an Air 13Agency Certificate and are empowered to operate an approved 14repair station by the Federal Aviation Administration, (ii) 15have a Class IV Rating, and (iii) conduct operations in 16accordance with Part 145 of the Federal Aviation Regulations. 17The exemption does not include aircraft operated by a 18commercial air carrier providing scheduled passenger air 19service pursuant to authority issued under Part 121 or Part 20129 of the Federal Aviation Regulations. From January 1, 2024 21through December 31, 2029, this exemption applies only to the 22transfer of qualifying tangible personal property incident to: 23(A) the modification, refurbishment, completion, repair, 24replacement, or maintenance of an aircraft by persons who (i) 25hold an Air Agency Certificate and are empowered to operate an 26approved repair station by the Federal Aviation   SB1633- 63 -LRB104 08081 HLH 18127 b1Administration, (ii) have a Class IV Rating, and (iii) conduct 2operations in accordance with Part 145 of the Federal Aviation 3Regulations; and (B) the modification, replacement, repair, 4and maintenance of aircraft engines or power plants without 5regard to whether or not those persons meet the qualifications 6of item (A).7    The changes made to this paragraph (29) by Public Act 898-534 are declarative of existing law. It is the intent of the 9General Assembly that the exemption under this paragraph (29) 10applies continuously from January 1, 2010 through December 31, 112024; however, no claim for credit or refund is allowed for 12taxes paid as a result of the disallowance of this exemption on 13or after January 1, 2015 and prior to February 5, 2020 (the 14effective date of Public Act 101-629).15    (30) Beginning January 1, 2017 and through December 31, 162026, menstrual pads, tampons, and menstrual cups. 17    (31) Tangible personal property transferred to a purchaser 18who is exempt from tax by operation of federal law. This 19paragraph is exempt from the provisions of Section 3-55. 20    (32) Qualified tangible personal property used in the 21construction or operation of a data center that has been 22granted a certificate of exemption by the Department of 23Commerce and Economic Opportunity, whether that tangible 24personal property is purchased by the owner, operator, or 25tenant of the data center or by a contractor or subcontractor 26of the owner, operator, or tenant. Data centers that would   SB1633- 64 -LRB104 08081 HLH 18127 b1have qualified for a certificate of exemption prior to January 21, 2020 had Public Act 101-31 been in effect, may apply for and 3obtain an exemption for subsequent purchases of computer 4equipment or enabling software purchased or leased to upgrade, 5supplement, or replace computer equipment or enabling software 6purchased or leased in the original investment that would have 7qualified. 8    The Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity shall 9grant a certificate of exemption under this item (32) to 10qualified data centers as defined by Section 605-1025 of the 11Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity Law of the 12Civil Administrative Code of Illinois. 13    For the purposes of this item (32): 14        "Data center" means a building or a series of 15    buildings rehabilitated or constructed to house working 16    servers in one physical location or multiple sites within 17    the State of Illinois. 18        "Qualified tangible personal property" means: 19    electrical systems and equipment; climate control and 20    chilling equipment and systems; mechanical systems and 21    equipment; monitoring and secure systems; emergency 22    generators; hardware; computers; servers; data storage 23    devices; network connectivity equipment; racks; cabinets; 24    telecommunications cabling infrastructure; raised floor 25    systems; peripheral components or systems; software; 26    mechanical, electrical, or plumbing systems; battery   SB1633- 65 -LRB104 08081 HLH 18127 b1    systems; cooling systems and towers; temperature control 2    systems; other cabling; and other data center 3    infrastructure equipment and systems necessary to operate 4    qualified tangible personal property, including fixtures; 5    and component parts of any of the foregoing, including 6    installation, maintenance, repair, refurbishment, and 7    replacement of qualified tangible personal property to 8    generate, transform, transmit, distribute, or manage 9    electricity necessary to operate qualified tangible 10    personal property; and all other tangible personal 11    property that is essential to the operations of a computer 12    data center. The term "qualified tangible personal 13    property" also includes building materials physically 14    incorporated into the qualifying data center. To document 15    the exemption allowed under this Section, the retailer 16    must obtain from the purchaser a copy of the certificate 17    of eligibility issued by the Department of Commerce and 18    Economic Opportunity. 19    This item (32) is exempt from the provisions of Section 203-55. 21    (33) Beginning July 1, 2022, breast pumps, breast pump 22collection and storage supplies, and breast pump kits. This 23item (33) is exempt from the provisions of Section 3-55. As 24used in this item (33): 25        "Breast pump" means an electrically controlled or 26    manually controlled pump device designed or marketed to be   SB1633- 66 -LRB104 08081 HLH 18127 b1    used to express milk from a human breast during lactation, 2    including the pump device and any battery, AC adapter, or 3    other power supply unit that is used to power the pump 4    device and is packaged and sold with the pump device at the 5    time of sale. 6        "Breast pump collection and storage supplies" means 7    items of tangible personal property designed or marketed 8    to be used in conjunction with a breast pump to collect 9    milk expressed from a human breast and to store collected 10    milk until it is ready for consumption. 11        "Breast pump collection and storage supplies" 12    includes, but is not limited to: breast shields and breast 13    shield connectors; breast pump tubes and tubing adapters; 14    breast pump valves and membranes; backflow protectors and 15    backflow protector adaptors; bottles and bottle caps 16    specific to the operation of the breast pump; and breast 17    milk storage bags. 18        "Breast pump collection and storage supplies" does not 19    include: (1) bottles and bottle caps not specific to the 20    operation of the breast pump; (2) breast pump travel bags 21    and other similar carrying accessories, including ice 22    packs, labels, and other similar products; (3) breast pump 23    cleaning supplies; (4) nursing bras, bra pads, breast 24    shells, and other similar products; and (5) creams, 25    ointments, and other similar products that relieve 26    breastfeeding-related symptoms or conditions of the   SB1633- 67 -LRB104 08081 HLH 18127 b1    breasts or nipples, unless sold as part of a breast pump 2    kit that is pre-packaged by the breast pump manufacturer 3    or distributor. 4        "Breast pump kit" means a kit that: (1) contains no 5    more than a breast pump, breast pump collection and 6    storage supplies, a rechargeable battery for operating the 7    breast pump, a breastmilk cooler, bottle stands, ice 8    packs, and a breast pump carrying case; and (2) is 9    pre-packaged as a breast pump kit by the breast pump 10    manufacturer or distributor. 11    (34) Tangible personal property sold by or on behalf of 12the State Treasurer pursuant to the Revised Uniform Unclaimed 13Property Act. This item (34) is exempt from the provisions of 14Section 3-55.15    (35) Beginning on January 1, 2024, tangible personal 16property purchased by an active duty member of the armed 17forces of the United States who presents valid military 18identification and purchases the property using a form of 19payment where the federal government is the payor. The member 20of the armed forces must complete, at the point of sale, a form 21prescribed by the Department of Revenue documenting that the 22transaction is eligible for the exemption under this 23paragraph. Retailers must keep the form as documentation of 24the exemption in their records for a period of not less than 6 25years. "Armed forces of the United States" means the United 26States Army, Navy, Air Force, Space Force, Marine Corps, or   SB1633- 68 -LRB104 08081 HLH 18127 b1Coast Guard. This paragraph is exempt from the provisions of 2Section 3-55. 3    (36) Beginning July 1, 2024, home-delivered meals provided 4to Medicare or Medicaid recipients when payment is made by an 5intermediary, such as a Medicare Administrative Contractor, a 6Managed Care Organization, or a Medicare Advantage 7Organization, pursuant to a government contract. This 8paragraph (36) (35) is exempt from the provisions of Section 93-55. 10    (37) (36) Beginning on January 1, 2026, as further defined 11in Section 3-10, food prepared for immediate consumption and 12transferred incident to a sale of service subject to this Act 13or the Service Use Tax Act by an entity licensed under the 14Hospital Licensing Act, the Nursing Home Care Act, the 15Assisted Living and Shared Housing Act, the ID/DD Community 16Care Act, the MC/DD Act, the Specialized Mental Health 17Rehabilitation Act of 2013, or the Child Care Act of 1969 or by 18an entity that holds a permit issued pursuant to the Life Care 19Facilities Act. This item (37) (36) is exempt from the 20provisions of Section 3-55. 21    (38) (37) Beginning on January 1, 2026, as further defined 22in Section 3-10, food for human consumption that is to be 23consumed off the premises where it is sold (other than 24alcoholic beverages, food consisting of or infused with adult 25use cannabis, soft drinks, candy, and food that has been 26prepared for immediate consumption). This item (38) (37) is   SB1633- 69 -LRB104 08081 HLH 18127 b1exempt from the provisions of Section 3-55. 2    (39) (36) The lease of the following tangible personal 3property:4        (1) computer software transferred subject to a license 5    that meets the following requirements:6            (A) it is evidenced by a written agreement signed 7        by the licensor and the customer;8                (i) an electronic agreement in which the 9            customer accepts the license by means of an 10            electronic signature that is verifiable and can be 11            authenticated and is attached to or made part of 12            the license will comply with this requirement;13                (ii) a license agreement in which the customer 14            electronically accepts the terms by clicking "I 15            agree" does not comply with this requirement;16            (B) it restricts the customer's duplication and 17        use of the software;18            (C) it prohibits the customer from licensing, 19        sublicensing, or transferring the software to a third 20        party (except to a related party) without the 21        permission and continued control of the licensor;22            (D) the licensor has a policy of providing another 23        copy at minimal or no charge if the customer loses or 24        damages the software, or of permitting the licensee to 25        make and keep an archival copy, and such policy is 26        either stated in the license agreement, supported by   SB1633- 70 -LRB104 08081 HLH 18127 b1        the licensor's books and records, or supported by a 2        notarized statement made under penalties of perjury by 3        the licensor; and4            (E) the customer must destroy or return all copies 5        of the software to the licensor at the end of the 6        license period; this provision is deemed to be met, in 7        the case of a perpetual license, without being set 8        forth in the license agreement; and9        (2) property that is subject to a tax on lease 10    receipts imposed by a home rule unit of local government 11    if the ordinance imposing that tax was adopted prior to 12    January 1, 2023; and . 13        (3) solar energy systems, as defined in Section 10-5 14    of the Property Tax Code. 15(Source: P.A. 102-16, eff. 6-17-21; 102-700, Article 70, 16Section 70-15, eff. 4-19-22; 102-700, Article 75, Section 1775-15, eff. 4-19-22; 102-1026, eff. 5-27-22; 103-9, Article 5, 18Section 5-15, eff. 6-7-23; 103-9, Article 15, Section 15-15, 19eff. 6-7-23; 103-154, eff. 6-30-23; 103-384, eff. 1-1-24; 20103-592, eff. 1-1-25; 103-605, eff. 7-1-24; 103-643, eff. 217-1-24; 103-746, eff. 1-1-25; 103-781, eff. 8-5-24; 103-995, 22eff. 8-9-24; revised 11-26-24.) 23    Section 20. The Retailers' Occupation Tax Act is amended 24by changing Section 2-5 as follows:   SB1633- 71 -LRB104 08081 HLH 18127 b1    (35 ILCS 120/2-5)2    Sec. 2-5. Exemptions. Gross receipts from proceeds from 3the sale, which, on and after January 1, 2025, includes the 4lease, of the following tangible personal property are exempt 5from the tax imposed by this Act:6        (1) Farm chemicals.7        (2) Farm machinery and equipment, both new and used, 8    including that manufactured on special order, certified by 9    the purchaser to be used primarily for production 10    agriculture or State or federal agricultural programs, 11    including individual replacement parts for the machinery 12    and equipment, including machinery and equipment purchased 13    for lease, and including implements of husbandry defined 14    in Section 1-130 of the Illinois Vehicle Code, farm 15    machinery and agricultural chemical and fertilizer 16    spreaders, and nurse wagons required to be registered 17    under Section 3-809 of the Illinois Vehicle Code, but 18    excluding other motor vehicles required to be registered 19    under the Illinois Vehicle Code. Horticultural polyhouses 20    or hoop houses used for propagating, growing, or 21    overwintering plants shall be considered farm machinery 22    and equipment under this item (2). Agricultural chemical 23    tender tanks and dry boxes shall include units sold 24    separately from a motor vehicle required to be licensed 25    and units sold mounted on a motor vehicle required to be 26    licensed, if the selling price of the tender is separately   SB1633- 72 -LRB104 08081 HLH 18127 b1    stated.2        Farm machinery and equipment shall include precision 3    farming equipment that is installed or purchased to be 4    installed on farm machinery and equipment including, but 5    not limited to, tractors, harvesters, sprayers, planters, 6    seeders, or spreaders. Precision farming equipment 7    includes, but is not limited to, soil testing sensors, 8    computers, monitors, software, global positioning and 9    mapping systems, and other such equipment.10        Farm machinery and equipment also includes computers, 11    sensors, software, and related equipment used primarily in 12    the computer-assisted operation of production agriculture 13    facilities, equipment, and activities such as, but not 14    limited to, the collection, monitoring, and correlation of 15    animal and crop data for the purpose of formulating animal 16    diets and agricultural chemicals. 17        Beginning on January 1, 2024, farm machinery and 18    equipment also includes electrical power generation 19    equipment used primarily for production agriculture. 20        This item (2) is exempt from the provisions of Section 21    2-70.22        (3) Until July 1, 2003, distillation machinery and 23    equipment, sold as a unit or kit, assembled or installed 24    by the retailer, certified by the user to be used only for 25    the production of ethyl alcohol that will be used for 26    consumption as motor fuel or as a component of motor fuel   SB1633- 73 -LRB104 08081 HLH 18127 b1    for the personal use of the user, and not subject to sale 2    or resale.3        (4) Until July 1, 2003 and beginning again September 4    1, 2004 through August 30, 2014, graphic arts machinery 5    and equipment, including repair and replacement parts, 6    both new and used, and including that manufactured on 7    special order or purchased for lease, certified by the 8    purchaser to be used primarily for graphic arts 9    production. Equipment includes chemicals or chemicals 10    acting as catalysts but only if the chemicals or chemicals 11    acting as catalysts effect a direct and immediate change 12    upon a graphic arts product. Beginning on July 1, 2017, 13    graphic arts machinery and equipment is included in the 14    manufacturing and assembling machinery and equipment 15    exemption under paragraph (14).16        (5) A motor vehicle that is used for automobile 17    renting, as defined in the Automobile Renting Occupation 18    and Use Tax Act. This paragraph is exempt from the 19    provisions of Section 2-70.20        (6) Personal property sold by a teacher-sponsored 21    student organization affiliated with an elementary or 22    secondary school located in Illinois.23        (7) Until July 1, 2003, proceeds of that portion of 24    the selling price of a passenger car the sale of which is 25    subject to the Replacement Vehicle Tax.26        (8) Personal property sold to an Illinois county fair   SB1633- 74 -LRB104 08081 HLH 18127 b1    association for use in conducting, operating, or promoting 2    the county fair.3        (9) Personal property sold to a not-for-profit arts or 4    cultural organization that establishes, by proof required 5    by the Department by rule, that it has received an 6    exemption under Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue 7    Code and that is organized and operated primarily for the 8    presentation or support of arts or cultural programming, 9    activities, or services. These organizations include, but 10    are not limited to, music and dramatic arts organizations 11    such as symphony orchestras and theatrical groups, arts 12    and cultural service organizations, local arts councils, 13    visual arts organizations, and media arts organizations. 14    On and after July 1, 2001 (the effective date of Public Act 15    92-35), however, an entity otherwise eligible for this 16    exemption shall not make tax-free purchases unless it has 17    an active identification number issued by the Department.18        (10) Personal property sold by a corporation, society, 19    association, foundation, institution, or organization, 20    other than a limited liability company, that is organized 21    and operated as a not-for-profit service enterprise for 22    the benefit of persons 65 years of age or older if the 23    personal property was not purchased by the enterprise for 24    the purpose of resale by the enterprise.25        (11) Except as otherwise provided in this Section, 26    personal property sold to a governmental body, to a   SB1633- 75 -LRB104 08081 HLH 18127 b1    corporation, society, association, foundation, or 2    institution organized and operated exclusively for 3    charitable, religious, or educational purposes, or to a 4    not-for-profit corporation, society, association, 5    foundation, institution, or organization that has no 6    compensated officers or employees and that is organized 7    and operated primarily for the recreation of persons 55 8    years of age or older. A limited liability company may 9    qualify for the exemption under this paragraph only if the 10    limited liability company is organized and operated 11    exclusively for educational purposes. On and after July 1, 12    1987, however, no entity otherwise eligible for this 13    exemption shall make tax-free purchases unless it has an 14    active identification number issued by the Department.15        (12) (Blank).16        (12-5) On and after July 1, 2003 and through June 30, 17    2004, motor vehicles of the second division with a gross 18    vehicle weight in excess of 8,000 pounds that are subject 19    to the commercial distribution fee imposed under Section 20    3-815.1 of the Illinois Vehicle Code. Beginning on July 1, 21    2004 and through June 30, 2005, the use in this State of 22    motor vehicles of the second division: (i) with a gross 23    vehicle weight rating in excess of 8,000 pounds; (ii) that 24    are subject to the commercial distribution fee imposed 25    under Section 3-815.1 of the Illinois Vehicle Code; and 26    (iii) that are primarily used for commercial purposes.   SB1633- 76 -LRB104 08081 HLH 18127 b1    Through June 30, 2005, this exemption applies to repair 2    and replacement parts added after the initial purchase of 3    such a motor vehicle if that motor vehicle is used in a 4    manner that would qualify for the rolling stock exemption 5    otherwise provided for in this Act. For purposes of this 6    paragraph, "used for commercial purposes" means the 7    transportation of persons or property in furtherance of 8    any commercial or industrial enterprise whether for-hire 9    or not. 10        (13) Proceeds from sales to owners or lessors, 11    lessees, or shippers of tangible personal property that is 12    utilized by interstate carriers for hire for use as 13    rolling stock moving in interstate commerce and equipment 14    operated by a telecommunications provider, licensed as a 15    common carrier by the Federal Communications Commission, 16    which is permanently installed in or affixed to aircraft 17    moving in interstate commerce.18        (14) Machinery and equipment that will be used by the 19    purchaser, or a lessee of the purchaser, primarily in the 20    process of manufacturing or assembling tangible personal 21    property for wholesale or retail sale or lease, whether 22    the sale or lease is made directly by the manufacturer or 23    by some other person, whether the materials used in the 24    process are owned by the manufacturer or some other 25    person, or whether the sale or lease is made apart from or 26    as an incident to the seller's engaging in the service   SB1633- 77 -LRB104 08081 HLH 18127 b1    occupation of producing machines, tools, dies, jigs, 2    patterns, gauges, or other similar items of no commercial 3    value on special order for a particular purchaser. The 4    exemption provided by this paragraph (14) does not include 5    machinery and equipment used in (i) the generation of 6    electricity for wholesale or retail sale; (ii) the 7    generation or treatment of natural or artificial gas for 8    wholesale or retail sale that is delivered to customers 9    through pipes, pipelines, or mains; or (iii) the treatment 10    of water for wholesale or retail sale that is delivered to 11    customers through pipes, pipelines, or mains. The 12    provisions of Public Act 98-583 are declaratory of 13    existing law as to the meaning and scope of this 14    exemption. Beginning on July 1, 2017, the exemption 15    provided by this paragraph (14) includes, but is not 16    limited to, graphic arts machinery and equipment, as 17    defined in paragraph (4) of this Section.18        (15) Proceeds of mandatory service charges separately 19    stated on customers' bills for purchase and consumption of 20    food and beverages, to the extent that the proceeds of the 21    service charge are in fact turned over as tips or as a 22    substitute for tips to the employees who participate 23    directly in preparing, serving, hosting or cleaning up the 24    food or beverage function with respect to which the 25    service charge is imposed. 26        (16) Tangible personal property sold to a purchaser if   SB1633- 78 -LRB104 08081 HLH 18127 b1    the purchaser is exempt from use tax by operation of 2    federal law. This paragraph is exempt from the provisions 3    of Section 2-70. 4        (17) Tangible personal property sold to a common 5    carrier by rail or motor that receives the physical 6    possession of the property in Illinois and that transports 7    the property, or shares with another common carrier in the 8    transportation of the property, out of Illinois on a 9    standard uniform bill of lading showing the seller of the 10    property as the shipper or consignor of the property to a 11    destination outside Illinois, for use outside Illinois.12        (18) Legal tender, currency, medallions, or gold or 13    silver coinage issued by the State of Illinois, the 14    government of the United States of America, or the 15    government of any foreign country, and bullion.16        (19) Until July 1, 2003, oil field exploration, 17    drilling, and production equipment, including (i) rigs and 18    parts of rigs, rotary rigs, cable tool rigs, and workover 19    rigs, (ii) pipe and tubular goods, including casing and 20    drill strings, (iii) pumps and pump-jack units, (iv) 21    storage tanks and flow lines, (v) any individual 22    replacement part for oil field exploration, drilling, and 23    production equipment, and (vi) machinery and equipment 24    purchased for lease; but excluding motor vehicles required 25    to be registered under the Illinois Vehicle Code.26        (20) Photoprocessing machinery and equipment,   SB1633- 79 -LRB104 08081 HLH 18127 b1    including repair and replacement parts, both new and used, 2    including that manufactured on special order, certified by 3    the purchaser to be used primarily for photoprocessing, 4    and including photoprocessing machinery and equipment 5    purchased for lease.6        (21) Until July 1, 2028, coal and aggregate 7    exploration, mining, off-highway hauling, processing, 8    maintenance, and reclamation equipment, including 9    replacement parts and equipment, and including equipment 10    purchased for lease, but excluding motor vehicles required 11    to be registered under the Illinois Vehicle Code. The 12    changes made to this Section by Public Act 97-767 apply on 13    and after July 1, 2003, but no claim for credit or refund 14    is allowed on or after August 16, 2013 (the effective date 15    of Public Act 98-456) for such taxes paid during the 16    period beginning July 1, 2003 and ending on August 16, 17    2013 (the effective date of Public Act 98-456).18        (22) Until June 30, 2013, fuel and petroleum products 19    sold to or used by an air carrier, certified by the carrier 20    to be used for consumption, shipment, or storage in the 21    conduct of its business as an air common carrier, for a 22    flight destined for or returning from a location or 23    locations outside the United States without regard to 24    previous or subsequent domestic stopovers.25        Beginning July 1, 2013, fuel and petroleum products 26    sold to or used by an air carrier, certified by the carrier   SB1633- 80 -LRB104 08081 HLH 18127 b1    to be used for consumption, shipment, or storage in the 2    conduct of its business as an air common carrier, for a 3    flight that (i) is engaged in foreign trade or is engaged 4    in trade between the United States and any of its 5    possessions and (ii) transports at least one individual or 6    package for hire from the city of origination to the city 7    of final destination on the same aircraft, without regard 8    to a change in the flight number of that aircraft. 9        (23) A transaction in which the purchase order is 10    received by a florist who is located outside Illinois, but 11    who has a florist located in Illinois deliver the property 12    to the purchaser or the purchaser's donee in Illinois.13        (24) Fuel consumed or used in the operation of ships, 14    barges, or vessels that are used primarily in or for the 15    transportation of property or the conveyance of persons 16    for hire on rivers bordering on this State if the fuel is 17    delivered by the seller to the purchaser's barge, ship, or 18    vessel while it is afloat upon that bordering river.19        (25) Except as provided in item (25-5) of this 20    Section, a motor vehicle sold in this State to a 21    nonresident even though the motor vehicle is delivered to 22    the nonresident in this State, if the motor vehicle is not 23    to be titled in this State, and if a drive-away permit is 24    issued to the motor vehicle as provided in Section 3-603 25    of the Illinois Vehicle Code or if the nonresident 26    purchaser has vehicle registration plates to transfer to   SB1633- 81 -LRB104 08081 HLH 18127 b1    the motor vehicle upon returning to his or her home state. 2    The issuance of the drive-away permit or having the 3    out-of-state registration plates to be transferred is 4    prima facie evidence that the motor vehicle will not be 5    titled in this State.6        (25-5) The exemption under item (25) does not apply if 7    the state in which the motor vehicle will be titled does 8    not allow a reciprocal exemption for a motor vehicle sold 9    and delivered in that state to an Illinois resident but 10    titled in Illinois. The tax collected under this Act on 11    the sale of a motor vehicle in this State to a resident of 12    another state that does not allow a reciprocal exemption 13    shall be imposed at a rate equal to the state's rate of tax 14    on taxable property in the state in which the purchaser is 15    a resident, except that the tax shall not exceed the tax 16    that would otherwise be imposed under this Act. At the 17    time of the sale, the purchaser shall execute a statement, 18    signed under penalty of perjury, of his or her intent to 19    title the vehicle in the state in which the purchaser is a 20    resident within 30 days after the sale and of the fact of 21    the payment to the State of Illinois of tax in an amount 22    equivalent to the state's rate of tax on taxable property 23    in his or her state of residence and shall submit the 24    statement to the appropriate tax collection agency in his 25    or her state of residence. In addition, the retailer must 26    retain a signed copy of the statement in his or her   SB1633- 82 -LRB104 08081 HLH 18127 b1    records. Nothing in this item shall be construed to 2    require the removal of the vehicle from this state 3    following the filing of an intent to title the vehicle in 4    the purchaser's state of residence if the purchaser titles 5    the vehicle in his or her state of residence within 30 days 6    after the date of sale. The tax collected under this Act in 7    accordance with this item (25-5) shall be proportionately 8    distributed as if the tax were collected at the 6.25% 9    general rate imposed under this Act. 10        (25-7) Beginning on July 1, 2007, no tax is imposed 11    under this Act on the sale of an aircraft, as defined in 12    Section 3 of the Illinois Aeronautics Act, if all of the 13    following conditions are met:14            (1) the aircraft leaves this State within 15 days 15        after the later of either the issuance of the final 16        billing for the sale of the aircraft, or the 17        authorized approval for return to service, completion 18        of the maintenance record entry, and completion of the 19        test flight and ground test for inspection, as 20        required by 14 CFR 91.407;21            (2) the aircraft is not based or registered in 22        this State after the sale of the aircraft; and23            (3) the seller retains in his or her books and 24        records and provides to the Department a signed and 25        dated certification from the purchaser, on a form 26        prescribed by the Department, certifying that the   SB1633- 83 -LRB104 08081 HLH 18127 b1        requirements of this item (25-7) are met. The 2        certificate must also include the name and address of 3        the purchaser, the address of the location where the 4        aircraft is to be titled or registered, the address of 5        the primary physical location of the aircraft, and 6        other information that the Department may reasonably 7        require.8        For purposes of this item (25-7):9        "Based in this State" means hangared, stored, or 10    otherwise used, excluding post-sale customizations as 11    defined in this Section, for 10 or more days in each 12    12-month period immediately following the date of the sale 13    of the aircraft.14        "Registered in this State" means an aircraft 15    registered with the Department of Transportation, 16    Aeronautics Division, or titled or registered with the 17    Federal Aviation Administration to an address located in 18    this State.19        This paragraph (25-7) is exempt from the provisions of 20    Section 2-70. 21        (26) Semen used for artificial insemination of 22    livestock for direct agricultural production.23        (27) Horses, or interests in horses, registered with 24    and meeting the requirements of any of the Arabian Horse 25    Club Registry of America, Appaloosa Horse Club, American 26    Quarter Horse Association, United States Trotting   SB1633- 84 -LRB104 08081 HLH 18127 b1    Association, or Jockey Club, as appropriate, used for 2    purposes of breeding or racing for prizes. This item (27) 3    is exempt from the provisions of Section 2-70, and the 4    exemption provided for under this item (27) applies for 5    all periods beginning May 30, 1995, but no claim for 6    credit or refund is allowed on or after January 1, 2008 7    (the effective date of Public Act 95-88) for such taxes 8    paid during the period beginning May 30, 2000 and ending 9    on January 1, 2008 (the effective date of Public Act 10    95-88).11        (28) Computers and communications equipment utilized 12    for any hospital purpose and equipment used in the 13    diagnosis, analysis, or treatment of hospital patients 14    sold to a lessor who leases the equipment, under a lease of 15    one year or longer executed or in effect at the time of the 16    purchase, to a hospital that has been issued an active tax 17    exemption identification number by the Department under 18    Section 1g of this Act.19        (29) Personal property sold to a lessor who leases the 20    property, under a lease of one year or longer executed or 21    in effect at the time of the purchase, to a governmental 22    body that has been issued an active tax exemption 23    identification number by the Department under Section 1g 24    of this Act.25        (30) Beginning with taxable years ending on or after 26    December 31, 1995 and ending with taxable years ending on   SB1633- 85 -LRB104 08081 HLH 18127 b1    or before December 31, 2004, personal property that is 2    donated for disaster relief to be used in a State or 3    federally declared disaster area in Illinois or bordering 4    Illinois by a manufacturer or retailer that is registered 5    in this State to a corporation, society, association, 6    foundation, or institution that has been issued a sales 7    tax exemption identification number by the Department that 8    assists victims of the disaster who reside within the 9    declared disaster area.10        (31) Beginning with taxable years ending on or after 11    December 31, 1995 and ending with taxable years ending on 12    or before December 31, 2004, personal property that is 13    used in the performance of infrastructure repairs in this 14    State, including, but not limited to, municipal roads and 15    streets, access roads, bridges, sidewalks, waste disposal 16    systems, water and sewer line extensions, water 17    distribution and purification facilities, storm water 18    drainage and retention facilities, and sewage treatment 19    facilities, resulting from a State or federally declared 20    disaster in Illinois or bordering Illinois when such 21    repairs are initiated on facilities located in the 22    declared disaster area within 6 months after the disaster.23        (32) Beginning July 1, 1999, game or game birds sold 24    at a "game breeding and hunting preserve area" as that 25    term is used in the Wildlife Code. This paragraph is 26    exempt from the provisions of Section 2-70.  SB1633- 86 -LRB104 08081 HLH 18127 b1        (33) A motor vehicle, as that term is defined in 2    Section 1-146 of the Illinois Vehicle Code, that is 3    donated to a corporation, limited liability company, 4    society, association, foundation, or institution that is 5    determined by the Department to be organized and operated 6    exclusively for educational purposes. For purposes of this 7    exemption, "a corporation, limited liability company, 8    society, association, foundation, or institution organized 9    and operated exclusively for educational purposes" means 10    all tax-supported public schools, private schools that 11    offer systematic instruction in useful branches of 12    learning by methods common to public schools and that 13    compare favorably in their scope and intensity with the 14    course of study presented in tax-supported schools, and 15    vocational or technical schools or institutes organized 16    and operated exclusively to provide a course of study of 17    not less than 6 weeks duration and designed to prepare 18    individuals to follow a trade or to pursue a manual, 19    technical, mechanical, industrial, business, or commercial 20    occupation.21        (34) Beginning January 1, 2000, personal property, 22    including food, purchased through fundraising events for 23    the benefit of a public or private elementary or secondary 24    school, a group of those schools, or one or more school 25    districts if the events are sponsored by an entity 26    recognized by the school district that consists primarily   SB1633- 87 -LRB104 08081 HLH 18127 b1    of volunteers and includes parents and teachers of the 2    school children. This paragraph does not apply to 3    fundraising events (i) for the benefit of private home 4    instruction or (ii) for which the fundraising entity 5    purchases the personal property sold at the events from 6    another individual or entity that sold the property for 7    the purpose of resale by the fundraising entity and that 8    profits from the sale to the fundraising entity. This 9    paragraph is exempt from the provisions of Section 2-70.10        (35) Beginning January 1, 2000 and through December 11    31, 2001, new or used automatic vending machines that 12    prepare and serve hot food and beverages, including 13    coffee, soup, and other items, and replacement parts for 14    these machines. Beginning January 1, 2002 and through June 15    30, 2003, machines and parts for machines used in 16    commercial, coin-operated amusement and vending business 17    if a use or occupation tax is paid on the gross receipts 18    derived from the use of the commercial, coin-operated 19    amusement and vending machines. This paragraph is exempt 20    from the provisions of Section 2-70.21        (35-5) Beginning August 23, 2001 and through June 30, 22    2016, food for human consumption that is to be consumed 23    off the premises where it is sold (other than alcoholic 24    beverages, soft drinks, and food that has been prepared 25    for immediate consumption) and prescription and 26    nonprescription medicines, drugs, medical appliances, and   SB1633- 88 -LRB104 08081 HLH 18127 b1    insulin, urine testing materials, syringes, and needles 2    used by diabetics, for human use, when purchased for use 3    by a person receiving medical assistance under Article V 4    of the Illinois Public Aid Code who resides in a licensed 5    long-term care facility, as defined in the Nursing Home 6    Care Act, or a licensed facility as defined in the ID/DD 7    Community Care Act, the MC/DD Act, or the Specialized 8    Mental Health Rehabilitation Act of 2013.9        (36) Beginning August 2, 2001, computers and 10    communications equipment utilized for any hospital purpose 11    and equipment used in the diagnosis, analysis, or 12    treatment of hospital patients sold to a lessor who leases 13    the equipment, under a lease of one year or longer 14    executed or in effect at the time of the purchase, to a 15    hospital that has been issued an active tax exemption 16    identification number by the Department under Section 1g 17    of this Act. This paragraph is exempt from the provisions 18    of Section 2-70.19        (37) Beginning August 2, 2001, personal property sold 20    to a lessor who leases the property, under a lease of one 21    year or longer executed or in effect at the time of the 22    purchase, to a governmental body that has been issued an 23    active tax exemption identification number by the 24    Department under Section 1g of this Act. This paragraph is 25    exempt from the provisions of Section 2-70.26        (38) Beginning on January 1, 2002 and through June 30,   SB1633- 89 -LRB104 08081 HLH 18127 b1    2016, tangible personal property purchased from an 2    Illinois retailer by a taxpayer engaged in centralized 3    purchasing activities in Illinois who will, upon receipt 4    of the property in Illinois, temporarily store the 5    property in Illinois (i) for the purpose of subsequently 6    transporting it outside this State for use or consumption 7    thereafter solely outside this State or (ii) for the 8    purpose of being processed, fabricated, or manufactured 9    into, attached to, or incorporated into other tangible 10    personal property to be transported outside this State and 11    thereafter used or consumed solely outside this State. The 12    Director of Revenue shall, pursuant to rules adopted in 13    accordance with the Illinois Administrative Procedure Act, 14    issue a permit to any taxpayer in good standing with the 15    Department who is eligible for the exemption under this 16    paragraph (38). The permit issued under this paragraph 17    (38) shall authorize the holder, to the extent and in the 18    manner specified in the rules adopted under this Act, to 19    purchase tangible personal property from a retailer exempt 20    from the taxes imposed by this Act. Taxpayers shall 21    maintain all necessary books and records to substantiate 22    the use and consumption of all such tangible personal 23    property outside of the State of Illinois.24        (39) Beginning January 1, 2008, tangible personal 25    property used in the construction or maintenance of a 26    community water supply, as defined under Section 3.145 of   SB1633- 90 -LRB104 08081 HLH 18127 b1    the Environmental Protection Act, that is operated by a 2    not-for-profit corporation that holds a valid water supply 3    permit issued under Title IV of the Environmental 4    Protection Act. This paragraph is exempt from the 5    provisions of Section 2-70. 6        (40) Beginning January 1, 2010 and continuing through 7    December 31, 2029, materials, parts, equipment, 8    components, and furnishings incorporated into or upon an 9    aircraft as part of the modification, refurbishment, 10    completion, replacement, repair, or maintenance of the 11    aircraft. This exemption includes consumable supplies used 12    in the modification, refurbishment, completion, 13    replacement, repair, and maintenance of aircraft. However, 14    until January 1, 2024, this exemption excludes any 15    materials, parts, equipment, components, and consumable 16    supplies used in the modification, replacement, repair, 17    and maintenance of aircraft engines or power plants, 18    whether such engines or power plants are installed or 19    uninstalled upon any such aircraft. "Consumable supplies" 20    include, but are not limited to, adhesive, tape, 21    sandpaper, general purpose lubricants, cleaning solution, 22    latex gloves, and protective films. 23        Beginning January 1, 2010 and continuing through 24    December 31, 2023, this exemption applies only to the sale 25    of qualifying tangible personal property to persons who 26    modify, refurbish, complete, replace, or maintain an   SB1633- 91 -LRB104 08081 HLH 18127 b1    aircraft and who (i) hold an Air Agency Certificate and 2    are empowered to operate an approved repair station by the 3    Federal Aviation Administration, (ii) have a Class IV 4    Rating, and (iii) conduct operations in accordance with 5    Part 145 of the Federal Aviation Regulations. The 6    exemption does not include aircraft operated by a 7    commercial air carrier providing scheduled passenger air 8    service pursuant to authority issued under Part 121 or 9    Part 129 of the Federal Aviation Regulations. From January 10    1, 2024 through December 31, 2029, this exemption applies 11    only to the sale of qualifying tangible personal property 12    to: (A) persons who modify, refurbish, complete, repair, 13    replace, or maintain aircraft and who (i) hold an Air 14    Agency Certificate and are empowered to operate an 15    approved repair station by the Federal Aviation 16    Administration, (ii) have a Class IV Rating, and (iii) 17    conduct operations in accordance with Part 145 of the 18    Federal Aviation Regulations; and (B) persons who engage 19    in the modification, replacement, repair, and maintenance 20    of aircraft engines or power plants without regard to 21    whether or not those persons meet the qualifications of 22    item (A).23        The changes made to this paragraph (40) by Public Act 24    98-534 are declarative of existing law. It is the intent 25    of the General Assembly that the exemption under this 26    paragraph (40) applies continuously from January 1, 2010   SB1633- 92 -LRB104 08081 HLH 18127 b1    through December 31, 2024; however, no claim for credit or 2    refund is allowed for taxes paid as a result of the 3    disallowance of this exemption on or after January 1, 2015 4    and prior to February 5, 2020 (the effective date of 5    Public Act 101-629).6        (41) Tangible personal property sold to a 7    public-facilities corporation, as described in Section 8    11-65-10 of the Illinois Municipal Code, for purposes of 9    constructing or furnishing a municipal convention hall, 10    but only if the legal title to the municipal convention 11    hall is transferred to the municipality without any 12    further consideration by or on behalf of the municipality 13    at the time of the completion of the municipal convention 14    hall or upon the retirement or redemption of any bonds or 15    other debt instruments issued by the public-facilities 16    corporation in connection with the development of the 17    municipal convention hall. This exemption includes 18    existing public-facilities corporations as provided in 19    Section 11-65-25 of the Illinois Municipal Code. This 20    paragraph is exempt from the provisions of Section 2-70. 21        (42) Beginning January 1, 2017 and through December 22    31, 2026, menstrual pads, tampons, and menstrual cups. 23        (43) Merchandise that is subject to the Rental 24    Purchase Agreement Occupation and Use Tax. The purchaser 25    must certify that the item is purchased to be rented 26    subject to a rental-purchase agreement, as defined in the   SB1633- 93 -LRB104 08081 HLH 18127 b1    Rental-Purchase Agreement Act, and provide proof of 2    registration under the Rental Purchase Agreement 3    Occupation and Use Tax Act. This paragraph is exempt from 4    the provisions of Section 2-70.5        (44) Qualified tangible personal property used in the 6    construction or operation of a data center that has been 7    granted a certificate of exemption by the Department of 8    Commerce and Economic Opportunity, whether that tangible 9    personal property is purchased by the owner, operator, or 10    tenant of the data center or by a contractor or 11    subcontractor of the owner, operator, or tenant. Data 12    centers that would have qualified for a certificate of 13    exemption prior to January 1, 2020 had Public Act 101-31 14    been in effect, may apply for and obtain an exemption for 15    subsequent purchases of computer equipment or enabling 16    software purchased or leased to upgrade, supplement, or 17    replace computer equipment or enabling software purchased 18    or leased in the original investment that would have 19    qualified. 20        The Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity 21    shall grant a certificate of exemption under this item 22    (44) to qualified data centers as defined by Section 23    605-1025 of the Department of Commerce and Economic 24    Opportunity Law of the Civil Administrative Code of 25    Illinois. 26        For the purposes of this item (44):   SB1633- 94 -LRB104 08081 HLH 18127 b1            "Data center" means a building or a series of 2        buildings rehabilitated or constructed to house 3        working servers in one physical location or multiple 4        sites within the State of Illinois. 5            "Qualified tangible personal property" means: 6        electrical systems and equipment; climate control and 7        chilling equipment and systems; mechanical systems and 8        equipment; monitoring and secure systems; emergency 9        generators; hardware; computers; servers; data storage 10        devices; network connectivity equipment; racks; 11        cabinets; telecommunications cabling infrastructure; 12        raised floor systems; peripheral components or 13        systems; software; mechanical, electrical, or plumbing 14        systems; battery systems; cooling systems and towers; 15        temperature control systems; other cabling; and other 16        data center infrastructure equipment and systems 17        necessary to operate qualified tangible personal 18        property, including fixtures; and component parts of 19        any of the foregoing, including installation, 20        maintenance, repair, refurbishment, and replacement of 21        qualified tangible personal property to generate, 22        transform, transmit, distribute, or manage electricity 23        necessary to operate qualified tangible personal 24        property; and all other tangible personal property 25        that is essential to the operations of a computer data 26        center. The term "qualified tangible personal   SB1633- 95 -LRB104 08081 HLH 18127 b1        property" also includes building materials physically 2        incorporated into the qualifying data center. To 3        document the exemption allowed under this Section, the 4        retailer must obtain from the purchaser a copy of the 5        certificate of eligibility issued by the Department of 6        Commerce and Economic Opportunity. 7        This item (44) is exempt from the provisions of 8    Section 2-70. 9        (45) Beginning January 1, 2020 and through December 10    31, 2020, sales of tangible personal property made by a 11    marketplace seller over a marketplace for which tax is due 12    under this Act but for which use tax has been collected and 13    remitted to the Department by a marketplace facilitator 14    under Section 2d of the Use Tax Act are exempt from tax 15    under this Act. A marketplace seller claiming this 16    exemption shall maintain books and records demonstrating 17    that the use tax on such sales has been collected and 18    remitted by a marketplace facilitator. Marketplace sellers 19    that have properly remitted tax under this Act on such 20    sales may file a claim for credit as provided in Section 6 21    of this Act. No claim is allowed, however, for such taxes 22    for which a credit or refund has been issued to the 23    marketplace facilitator under the Use Tax Act, or for 24    which the marketplace facilitator has filed a claim for 25    credit or refund under the Use Tax Act. 26        (46) Beginning July 1, 2022, breast pumps, breast pump   SB1633- 96 -LRB104 08081 HLH 18127 b1    collection and storage supplies, and breast pump kits. 2    This item (46) is exempt from the provisions of Section 3    2-70. As used in this item (46): 4        "Breast pump" means an electrically controlled or 5    manually controlled pump device designed or marketed to be 6    used to express milk from a human breast during lactation, 7    including the pump device and any battery, AC adapter, or 8    other power supply unit that is used to power the pump 9    device and is packaged and sold with the pump device at the 10    time of sale. 11        "Breast pump collection and storage supplies" means 12    items of tangible personal property designed or marketed 13    to be used in conjunction with a breast pump to collect 14    milk expressed from a human breast and to store collected 15    milk until it is ready for consumption. 16        "Breast pump collection and storage supplies" 17    includes, but is not limited to: breast shields and breast 18    shield connectors; breast pump tubes and tubing adapters; 19    breast pump valves and membranes; backflow protectors and 20    backflow protector adaptors; bottles and bottle caps 21    specific to the operation of the breast pump; and breast 22    milk storage bags. 23        "Breast pump collection and storage supplies" does not 24    include: (1) bottles and bottle caps not specific to the 25    operation of the breast pump; (2) breast pump travel bags 26    and other similar carrying accessories, including ice   SB1633- 97 -LRB104 08081 HLH 18127 b1    packs, labels, and other similar products; (3) breast pump 2    cleaning supplies; (4) nursing bras, bra pads, breast 3    shells, and other similar products; and (5) creams, 4    ointments, and other similar products that relieve 5    breastfeeding-related symptoms or conditions of the 6    breasts or nipples, unless sold as part of a breast pump 7    kit that is pre-packaged by the breast pump manufacturer 8    or distributor. 9        "Breast pump kit" means a kit that: (1) contains no 10    more than a breast pump, breast pump collection and 11    storage supplies, a rechargeable battery for operating the 12    breast pump, a breastmilk cooler, bottle stands, ice 13    packs, and a breast pump carrying case; and (2) is 14    pre-packaged as a breast pump kit by the breast pump 15    manufacturer or distributor. 16        (47) Tangible personal property sold by or on behalf 17    of the State Treasurer pursuant to the Revised Uniform 18    Unclaimed Property Act. This item (47) is exempt from the 19    provisions of Section 2-70. 20        (48) Beginning on January 1, 2024, tangible personal 21    property purchased by an active duty member of the armed 22    forces of the United States who presents valid military 23    identification and purchases the property using a form of 24    payment where the federal government is the payor. The 25    member of the armed forces must complete, at the point of 26    sale, a form prescribed by the Department of Revenue   SB1633- 98 -LRB104 08081 HLH 18127 b1    documenting that the transaction is eligible for the 2    exemption under this paragraph. Retailers must keep the 3    form as documentation of the exemption in their records 4    for a period of not less than 6 years. "Armed forces of the 5    United States" means the United States Army, Navy, Air 6    Force, Space Force, Marine Corps, or Coast Guard. This 7    paragraph is exempt from the provisions of Section 2-70. 8        (49) Beginning July 1, 2024, home-delivered meals 9    provided to Medicare or Medicaid recipients when payment 10    is made by an intermediary, such as a Medicare 11    Administrative Contractor, a Managed Care Organization, or 12    a Medicare Advantage Organization, pursuant to a 13    government contract. This paragraph (49) is exempt from 14    the provisions of Section 2-70. 15        (50) (49) Beginning on January 1, 2026, as further 16    defined in Section 2-10, food for human consumption that 17    is to be consumed off the premises where it is sold (other 18    than alcoholic beverages, food consisting of or infused 19    with adult use cannabis, soft drinks, candy, and food that 20    has been prepared for immediate consumption). This item 21    (50) (49) is exempt from the provisions of Section 2-70. 22        (51) (49) Gross receipts from the lease of the 23    following tangible personal property:24            (1) computer software transferred subject to a 25        license that meets the following requirements:26                (A) it is evidenced by a written agreement   SB1633- 99 -LRB104 08081 HLH 18127 b1            signed by the licensor and the customer;2                    (i) an electronic agreement in which the 3                customer accepts the license by means of an 4                electronic signature that is verifiable and 5                can be authenticated and is attached to or 6                made part of the license will comply with this 7                requirement;8                    (ii) a license agreement in which the 9                customer electronically accepts the terms by 10                clicking "I agree" does not comply with this 11                requirement;12                (B) it restricts the customer's duplication 13            and use of the software;14                (C) it prohibits the customer from licensing, 15            sublicensing, or transferring the software to a 16            third party (except to a related party) without 17            the permission and continued control of the 18            licensor;19                (D) the licensor has a policy of providing 20            another copy at minimal or no charge if the 21            customer loses or damages the software, or of 22            permitting the licensee to make and keep an 23            archival copy, and such policy is either stated in 24            the license agreement, supported by the licensor's 25            books and records, or supported by a notarized 26            statement made under penalties of perjury by the   SB1633- 100 -LRB104 08081 HLH 18127 b1            licensor; and2                (E) the customer must destroy or return all 3            copies of the software to the licensor at the end 4            of the license period; this provision is deemed to 5            be met, in the case of a perpetual license, 6            without being set forth in the license agreement; 7            and8            (2) property that is subject to a tax on lease 9        receipts imposed by a home rule unit of local 10        government if the ordinance imposing that tax was 11        adopted prior to January 1, 2023; and . 12            (3) solar energy systems, as defined in Section 13        10-5 of the Property Tax Code. 14(Source: P.A. 102-16, eff. 6-17-21; 102-634, eff. 8-27-21; 15102-700, Article 70, Section 70-20, eff. 4-19-22; 102-700, 16Article 75, Section 75-20, eff. 4-19-22; 102-813, eff. 175-13-22; 102-1026, eff. 5-27-22; 103-9, Article 5, Section 185-20, eff. 6-7-23; 103-9, Article 15, Section 15-20, eff. 196-7-23; 103-154, eff. 6-30-23; 103-384, eff. 1-1-24; 103-592, 20eff. 1-1-25; 103-605, eff. 7-1-24; 103-643, eff. 7-1-24; 21103-746, eff. 1-1-25; 103-781, eff. 8-5-24; 103-995, eff. 228-9-24; revised 11-26-24.)